[Daily Discussion] Saturday, May 19, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Sunday, May 20, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kqeh2/daily_discussion_sunday_may_20_2018/)
if there’s one thing I wish this sub would do, it’s stop with all the hindsight “I told ya so” posts and ridiculing of others.

This place is very dear to my heart and means a lot to me. People think its aplace to come troll and laugh at people who were wrong. I wish it wasn’t so, but it is.

I just want the people who matter in here (you know who you are, the lsit is too long to write out), that I appreciate you, your efforts and the fact that you pick yourselves up every day to
make the next trade, post the next chart, argue the next point. I have friends in Crypto and outside of Crypto, but you are a special type of friend... like people who went to war together. Strangers that became brothers in a way. I know Im being dramatic, but who cares!

To the ones who come here to start some shit or laugh at others (you know who you are, the list is short, but your names are not worth mentioning)... I pity you... I really do.

To the moon! Or the core... I don’t care... but let’s trade it either way
I include ETH in this analysis because I think ETH breaking this pattern will determine market direction.  Personally, I believe it will break bearish as ETH has yet to set a weekly higher low but it could also be a bull flag with continuation above $850, invalidating the weekly equilibrium pattern.  If ETH breaks bullish, I expect BTC to follow with a break above 10k.

ETH is in a daily tightening equilibrium pattern (lower highs and higher lows) with 24h volume on GDAX the lowest it has been since the drop from the 800s at 54k.  I find the lack of volume particularly concerning...  Could see a break of this early next week.  I put a question mark on the lower high being set today as we need confirmation of that with a close of tomorrow's candle.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/H3735qlO/

BTC is still in its daily downtrend... lower lows and lower highs.  Need to see a higher low and higher high to confirm the weekly higher low is set.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/TKute25l/

edit: also, does anyone else find it concerning/interesting that ETH has had two weekly inside bars while BTC has seen a price drop of over 20%?  Either the whole space is going to explode to the upside next week or ETH is just waiting to drop and play catch up with BTC...

I wonder if ETH starts to drop, would that money retreat into BTC thereby keeping it flat/slightly to the upside?
The man himself has spoken https://twitter.com/PeterLBrandt/status/997856604811804672

Personally, I'm hoping to God we reset daily RSI and smash both these wedges. If not, that is officially when i get worried.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/VKn7gZzq/

EDIT: on a side note, look at his 18MA. beautiful shit, if you used it as a buy/sell signal then you'd be a happy fucking bunny

EDIT2: im not gonna make a third post in the same thread, but i smoked a little and remembered that ages ago some big organisation said they wanted global crypto standards by summer (idk why i though of Mark Carney of BoE so maybe FSB?). Summer is around the corner
"Cryptocurrency: pretend to be a cypherpunk liberationtech fantasy while you throw millions of dollars at ostentatious displays of wealth"

"Cryptocurrency has solved the problem of wealth redistribution (from one set of yacht parties to another)"

Here's to the beautiful lemurs @ NYC blockchain week. Hold your heads high.

Vitalik was wise to forgo attending.
I'm mostly a lurker around here but I enjoy reading the analysis by some of the good traders and the general conversations. I'd like to bring a slightly different perspective. I'm not that great at TA, neither do I strongly believe in indicators (mostly because they're lagging). I derive most of my research from FA, and long term, the future of Bitcoin is much better than before. I think previously it was a fight between whether BTC will exist or not, now it's about which price it will trade at. Secondly, I believe that banks will be a big part of the next generation of adoption. Banks will go where the money goes. Not just fiat. Money in general. They will set up crypto trading desks, offer wallets and finally give loans in crypto. They don't care, much! Governments on the other hand, have an important thing to lose... Control! That's where the next battle will be. As an investor, I think there's still years for people to make money from this market, until it stabilises and loses volatility. Until then, keep up the good work guys and shoulder on. 
Ok everyone all the best to you and yours i am checking out of this sub for now

Last thought is that in my view we have seen more and more algorithmic trading with plenty of money behind it.

The relevant structures and price points to me still work on 4hr and above, but lower time frames are less so. The bots will make it look fucked up, but the destination is the same as when it was more "human". Pick your direction and try not to get double faked-out by the computers/whales.

If you gamble then you have to guess and be in before the pump and sell within the first five minutes, with the one-off chance that one of these pumps will be Yuuuuge

Peace
 If we have another red 3d candle we would have the longest series of red 3d candles since August 2016. 
Not opening a position until I get up from the sweet nap I am just about to take. Going to sleep like a cat. Haha.

Nothing like the feel of closing an underwater long in green after five lengthy days full of mental torture, phew!
Still on track.

No breakout volume as of yet so Sunday decline into Monday breakout seems like the logical play for now. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/m8i5N9i3/

https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/qx4qvdKY-Bitcoin-Bullish-signs-and-why-we-won-t-see-5k-before-13k/
Alts are starting to take off which recently is a good indicator for btcs next move.
Long from around $8,250

Edit: bull flag is at a make or break point, and it's looking like It's going to break up momentarily. If I'm wrong I'll take a small loss. 
about an hour ago I was standing at a train station waiting for my train thay only comes by every hour. I was so immersed in the charts that I missed my train... (which meant I would miss my
flight if I didnt take the taxi).

Pulled the trigger on 40k contracts long and walked over to the taxi stand... pissed off that I was about to pay out the ass for a 50 minute taxi ride.

Open the door, get in. check my phone...

0.07 BTC profit.

Closed and gave the taxi driver a big tip when we arrived. Gotta give back every once in a while.

Happy weekend gents! It’s wedding season!!!
Oi.  Had to go out for family stuff today. Before that, was looking at a "fuck it this isn't going up" short from the previous night at break even, thinking it was a good chance to bail as I'd be too busy to babysit it today.  Said "fuck it let it ride".

Out shopping, I see the green candle, got stopped out for a 5% loss to trading stack.

So I'm looking at the chart on mobile while out, and I see that the green candle was smacked down, and see that the next candles going down.  So I put my credit card against the screen to simulate that resistance line, and what I saw is that it was testing the line and hadn't pushed back through it yet so I thought perhaps it was successful testing the line.  So opened a long.

Nope! I get home and see it was under the resistance basically that whole time.  Thankfully was able to close that long at "break even" (cost me a double cheeseburger)

PSA, Don't do TA with a credit card drawn trend-line on your phone screen ;)  I should have checked in here first to see if someone had posted a chart (no time for that though at that moment)

Should give this 7 hours or so until it goes sideways for another encounter with the trendline and check back. (but actually I already opened another short... lol)

Edit: if this goes above the resistance line, I'll probably flip long.  Schizophrenic.
Short from $8,250. 

Same reason I exited my long. 
Glad it was Gilfoyle written to delve into BTC/mining on Silicon Valley.

The show's ambassador to truth.
Why does Bitmex automatically increase my leverage (and subsequently lowers my Available Balance [or not? - edit at the end...]), as the price moves against my position and gets closer to the liquidation price?

I would expect that whatever margin/leverage I had assigned to a position upon opening it, that Bitmex would NOT eat into my remaining balance. Isn't that supposed to be the difference between Cross Margin and Isolated Margin?

I have read their docs, and I still don't get it (I'm sure it's something very basic that I'm missing). And it's especially frustrating after an event such as yesterday's API clusterf* - or in any other scenario in which I would suddenly lose control over my position/orders.

Is there a way to prevent that from happening?

- e.g. if I open a position with 50% of my Total Balance, how can I ensure that I won't lose any more than that in the event of a liquidation, due to Bitmex automatically increasing my leverage?

EDIT: While testing now with very high leverage on their testnet, I'm not so sure anymore about the "lowering my Available Balance" part. My leverage does indeed go up by itself, but the balance appears to be the same. But I could swear there have been occasions when my Available Balance was also going down, during high volatility.
Short @8350. Targetting 7980, stops 8450

Scaling into longs below 8k with stops below 6900

My chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/Gke2YcHs/

EDIT: expecting to fall down the wedge and possibly break out lower. also, 3x lev for anyone interested, nothing crazy. enjoy gambling.
on the 15m chart....is this a descending triangle? after the BGD this morning? Sorry, new to TA
Perfect, Bitcoin decides to make a move 15 minutes before I walk into work 

*never fucking fails*
Ascending channel broke down. Closed my long at $8,255. 

Edit: market broke back in, but I'm not going to hop back into a long. 
Idk what's going on but Finex is seeing some big volume in this 15 min candle, and a lot of dicking back n forth on the charts. Coul be seeing a move soon...
Moved stops on my short to breakeven, this might bart back up. ETH broke past
Bull flag, fake breakdown, recovery, breakout


Deja vu?

even the volume on the dump is really terrible. 
Volume is below 4000 on GDAX. [https://i.imgur.com/Xb3hmdY.png](https://i.imgur.com/Xb3hmdY.png)
Can someone explain me this sudden spikes in volume? Is that sudden market move from new buyers, or is it orchestrated with whales or some other people that are buying/selling instantly?

I expect BTC sliding back a little bit now with low volume, it will touch support and someone will push the price higher again. Sell pressure completely evaporated after 8k drop.
I dont remember ever seeing BTC volume being this low on GDAX before. 4.5k in 24 hours? Does that mean we are about to tank? Did all the bots break lol
Ah, the great battle of 8249
Well this morning has been fun...I was stopped out of my 10x short at 8280, but I had a buy stop set at same price and leverage that I sold in profit on the pump. Then shorted the spike and sold that position in profit.

Currently i have a 10x long open from 8172 that had filled earlier...watching and waiting but I am ready, willing, and able to trade this market in both directions.

You see this is a trading sub and I for one am here to, you know, TRADE, not be a tribal,ideological, hopium smoking, lambo craving douchebag

peace and good luck to all 
Good morning folks. I'm long again only to see if our old friend, the Saturday pre midday greenie, pops up again. Stops set at 8100. Looking to be out of position again at 1pm UTC.

Edit - I'm not overly confident about this trade as everything else out there appears in the toilet. It's gambling, pure and simple this morning.
[https://dickline.info/](https://dickline.info/)

We are 33 days behind. Good spot. 
Someone grab this wheezy mother fucker a defibrillator.
Does anyone here actually make money with a system? Seems like people just make trades based on whims. "Not sure what to do here but went long blah blah" 

"got stopped out..its ok i was expecting that"

what the hell is this shit...
Daily doji star reversal candle from yesterday could mean that were prime for a retest of support levels in the 7K range the next few days

The Bollinger bands on the 1h is spreading so volatility is right around the corner
Added a small position to my 8250 long posted yesterday at 8330. Moving my SL up to 8090. Until the market proves other wise, I’m treating 7900 as a higher low. Bears had over a week to get this under 8,000 convincingly and I’m starting to lean bullish. 
Who else is seeing this break down? Underwater shorts aren't feeling good.
did Mike close his one million short from yesterdays thread ?
Obviously if this pump to the trendline fails, that signals another leg down.  I wouldn't mind losing money on this short just to have the current downtrend end for awhile.  Still too early to call.
Sideways movement for 24 hours followed by an occasional $150 pump is simply infuriating and frustrating. Such a mindfuck this is..
Let's see if whales break this trendline:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/69wF4oBI/

See you back at around 8k for the next leg up...
We set our higher high on the 4H right as the candle was about to close this morning, so as long as we maintain a higher low above 8152 for the next 4 hours, we are looking at a possible breakout by this evening or into tomorrow. 

RSI on the 1H is at 61, so assuming we set a higher low in the 8175 range, the RSI should be reset enough for the next leg up. Macro view says that we should stay in the 8000-8500 range to close out the week which would provide continued tightening of the equilibrium pattern on the weekly for a break sometime at the end of June-early July. We wicked above the 50 Day Moving Average earlier on the move above 8300 but it is currently acting as resistance.

I'm sitting in my position that filled at 7950. Current mood: Bullish

Current resistance: 8485
Current support: 9152

4H: https://www.tradingview.com/x/JB5LBZDo/

1W: https://www.tradingview.com/x/UrhSPjFH/
When I plot the recent uptrends, they all seem to converge at the same point.

Any idea why that may be?

https://i.imgur.com/qFGThtG.png
Holy volume batman!
The 2018 FUD narratives for bitcoin:

- CME futs ruined price
- 160k Gox coins waiting to dump on you
- Buffet

What else?
I posted this before but it seems like a ton of people were caught off-guard by us going past 8300 again. Just some scenario's we might see over the next few days and to kind in mind.
___________
Right. So,

https://www.tradingview.com/x/dIk7TntN/

Btc still has some room to crawl up, but I don't see it passing the resistance as buying pressure is still, well, anal-beads. It might not even reach the resistance and already start heading down as the 4h Macd is already turning down again, however sub 8k the selling pressure becomes minimal.

For ethereum

https://www.tradingview.com/x/AmqipSmS/

we have passed the minor resistance (purple line) and we're moving to the orange resistance 697. I'm not sure if we'll have enough oompf to pass it, but even then there's still another resistance at 705 by that time.

I think both will grind up slowly to their resistances on low volume by the end on the day and then start rolling over to the downside of their respective ranges.

Bonus: Max severe pain scenario for BTC.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/c4tHW9gB/

purple arrows: push to 8499 so everyone and their mom thinks we bottomed, then let it plummet to 7600 so everyone thinks we're going to goblin town and then pump it back over 8k. This would also probably mean that eth breaks down from its H&S formation thus catalyzing the selling pressure.

Personal worst case scenario:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/iyzb4ks7/

Slow bleed to the bottom of our major triangle over the next two/three weeks.

have fun!
The pressure cooker is starting to whistle
bitcoin is bouncing off its resistance turned support; it's 1 dollar away from breaking it down

hold your breath hodlers

bulls have done a great job breaking out of it to resume the upwards movement and it's unlikely that they will give it up now

I'm pretty sure TA is impossible with volume this low. Record lows...
Is there anywhere i can go short on bitcoin volatility 
Whats the strongest support after 7800? Thanks guys 
Has anyone ever tried to open 100x market making position in times like these.

I am an extremely risk averse person, but I’m just thinking of opening 400k positions with like 1/2 a BTC to collect the maker fee... anyone ever do this?
As I nearly forgot about this myself, here's a little reminder to Bitfinex verified customers that FATCA/CRS forms are due by May 24.
https://www.zerohedge.com/news/2018-05-15/prop-trading-returns-volcker-rewrite-allows-banks-engage-short-term-trades

Thoughts on how this could effect crypto?
Man I miss the market. Thinking of throwing $50 in to see what kind of yolo margin trades I can do to keep the itch scratched until the end of June when I can get back into it full time.
Falling wedge since May, we didn't break it with our move to 8.4k right? Unfortunately I am currently not on my PC so can't look it up... do you think we will follow it down the following day/s to 7.8k and then bounce off of it and break it upwards? 
Opinions welcome-
Say you caught the bottom with a 25x or 50x long at $7900.(I didn’t) Here we are, painting ourselves in to a corner with the current price. You’ve been holding, are sitting on some nice profit and would like to let it ride.  Do you open another high leverage short with tight stops for hedge? Many ways to skin the cat, I’m sure.  What would you do?
I entered a risky short from 8300 which closed out 8215.  So I'm happy, but will stay out of position for now.
Closed my 8280 averaged long at 8190 for a loss. I’ve had some good trades lately so I’m gonna sit out  for a bit until the market decides what it wants to do. 
Things are getting a little spicier. Trying to spike it out of those 15m bbands but 8240-50 holding strong for now.
Man-children signalling decadence/wealth @ consensus 2018 was beyond cringeworthy. 

https://twitter.com/robbiebent1/status/997836670199320579

Look forward to the opposing pendulum swing. 

Acting on impulse/ego vs. acting in accordance with the impact you seek to have.
/r/buttcoin trolls are coming out of hiding. I expect a pump soon. 
US asleep, UK getting married. Would be a good time to catch the market off guard, ya think?
Could anyone be so kind to recommend me if there is any better app for android & Win to get notifications on price changes?

I am currently using "Bitcoin Checker" and I am not really happy with its performance. Sometimes it just has timeout error and never notifies me. Thank you!
Someone needs to give this little guy an energy drink.
This articles  floating about the bitcoin energy consumption is the biggest load of crap I've read. 

Large container ships burning up dirty gasoline for profit \- no one cares. Bitcoin mining operations burning up coal/wind for profit \- everyone loses their minds.

I don't see any difference between the two. Probably the real concern / significant fact is just a tragedy of commons thing.
Sold my stack ..feels like $8000 is at our door step
So we just need to get 50 USD higher to touch the res line, make or break time here. 
[deleted]
bought into the trap, fml, I'm the sucker today
Not good if that was the 3rd downtrend line touch since 10K and we don't get (and stay) above it.  That would suggest the next leg down: 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/h3KDDuWf/

I hope it makes a comeback, but I'm short for now.
Our first rise over this trend line on my daily. If it can clear and stay over 8300 I may place a small long . .  https://www.tradingview.com/x/kLJvElyk/
so we touched almost percectly the res line here. Bbands are tight af, the next hour ...
Still maintain that the 6 month chart is bullish. Happy to stay between 8 and 9 for a few weeks. There is a lot going on around the world facilitating larger adoption including institutional money becoming more confident. 2020 halving is something to keep in mind. Not trading right now just holding but please don't waste btc. I remember losing 5btc in a trade last June when that was about 15k. Don't want to look back in a couple of years and realise losses were 150k. Good luck to the traders but those sitting out for now just be patient. Cheers
Previous BTC rapid price rise catalyst = futures + price breaking $10k.

Next BTC rapid price rise catalyst = ___ + price breaking $10k. 

What might it be?
2 days ago we had the highest ever meassured hash rate of 36.900.000 TH/s. \(One year ago it was 4.500.000 TH/s, they must have produced fucking many ASICs in a short time and do not stop to produce them.\)

That corresponds to a total of 2.733.333 Antminer S9 with a 1350 Watt consumption. One Antminer costs around min. 1k USD, so this adds up to  2.7 Bil. USD worth of miners.

Dont tell me this coin is ded.
This place is funny, BTC goes up a couple of hundred $ and people are again implying a recovery, having not learnt from the numerous previous occasions.  

Whilst the sane people watch the chaos continue, down and down we go.
Support is at 8152. No worries for longs till it breaks that for a new lower low.

Edit: Downvotes for stating the current lower low. That's new.
The price is perfectly stabilized since we re-entered $8,000. First we created support at $8,100, stayed there for a while, then at $8,200, stayed there for longer and now it seems $8,250 is the new support.

I do not think it will be that difficult to crush this resistance line ahead of us and let the price shoot up. There is a lot of buying power in the market now, people are hesitant, but it won't take too long to change their perspectives.

As I wrote this, I just caught the wick and my underwater long has been closed successfully at $8,440 from $8,402 finally. 

I will reopen another long after sometime with hopefully a nice entry. 
!short XBTUSD 8225 5X 40%

Pretty much the same reason chewy or anyone else is shorting here. Broke through ascending channel after rejected at downtrend resistance. These days I'm only putting in actual stops for BGD protection, above where my "real" stop point will be. In this case I'm putting my stop at 8455 but will probably look to close at 8300 or so as we would be breaking back above the resistance trend.

edit: target for this is 7800 as I think we bounce off the support of a descending wedge, but I will be waiting for some decent support to manifest in case it breaks through and my target would then be 6800.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/1D896Uwr/
dildo time!
That was a long reach up to the downtrend line from $10K.   I'm betting it can't hold it and shorted this spike a bit.
In addition we have the likes of gates and buffet doing their best to discredit this space. Btc is anti fragile and will come out on top. Plus it's already changed my life. Measure your wealth in btc.
[deleted]
This sub is hilarious. When it was 8100 everyone was super bearish , now when it’s 8200 everyone suddenly became bullish. I don’t get it how $100 difference can change people mind so vastly. Anyway it’s fun to watch and i do HOPE that we’re indeed, bullish.
Feels like we will break out of the wedge at this point. The original res line is now at 8.3k, only a SGD is sufficient to push us out. 
Refresh Vegeta.
the 24h volume on GDAX is pathetic. just curious, who thinks it will break out up and who thinks down? 

Edit: and the answer is down, folks. what a surprise 
In less than 6 hours time is up and the market has to make a decision.

https://i.imgur.com/fYIEL2x.png
Happy to see that once again the bottom bear reverse indicator worked it's magic and succesfully predicted a bounce at 8k.

Now just gotta wait for the sentiment here to turn overwhelmingly bullish.
Looking at the charts, I have this empowering feeling I don't know why really, but it feels like there is big incoming storm. I could be 100% wrong, but I am placing my bets. 

I am long from $8,275.

*I am going away from away from reddit for a while, will be reading this sub, but won't be replying.*
https://grist.org/article/bitcoins-energy-use-got-studied-and-you-libertarian-nerds-look-even-worse-than-usual/
[deleted]
Short from 8250/ 8220 and pretty torn on what to do here. Can close for a small loss, but yet I feel like we are going to retest our lower levels of the 8000’s sometime in the near future.

We are poking our heads out at the top of the falling wedge on the larger timeframes, and if heavily rejected off the top again we could be looking at a target of $7900. But the first rejection was absolutely pathetic on the bear side

https://www.tradingview.com/x/0o7bbQB1/

So what’s everyone thinking here? Test of 8450? Or test of low 8000’s first 
The finex orderbook seems to be 2-3K BTC less on the buy side then yesterday, not a very useful indicator, just thought I'd share my observation
no posts for an hour? you guys Celtics fans too? this chop is rotting my brain and goddamnit I need more r/bm action. 
Low volume whale games. We retraced the whole afternoon dump just to hit the resistance from 9K one more time.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/2CaIsK3G/

Wicked a load of short entries that were left previously untouched from last time we were in this area.  My gut is telling me to hold them, my brain is saying just close now. Before we get the *Big Futures Pump*

What's the vibe in here at the moment?
I still hold my 7960 USD long. 

Reason: We did not broke under the original res line from our almost 10k top: [https://imgur.com/a/hnB86vn](https://imgur.com/a/hnB86vn)

If we fall below this line I consider closing my long. 
Bitcoin can be such a tease. I have a limit buy set at a certain price.  Almost hit it the other day. Not moving it.  Price goes up, I'm happy.  Price goes down, I'm happy.  But feeling very teased with the possibility of cheaper coins these past few days.  
Trying to learn, on the 1-min would you call this an ascending wedge (bearish) or ascending triangle (bullish)?
Guys, I think big shots are reading this sub, stop posting your positions! 

Bearish sentiment: BGD, tether pump

Bullish sentiment: BRD, korea fud
[removed]
Here is the uber\-bull scenario!

Large scale C&H pattern for Bitcoin: [https://imgur.com/a/98TIVGE](https://imgur.com/a/98TIVGE) \(also notice the descending broadening wedge pattern I added, [http://thepatternsite.com/dbw.html](http://thepatternsite.com/dbw.html)\)

Large scale iH&S pattern for Crypto\-Market: [https://imgur.com/a/hTsqRLO](https://imgur.com/a/hTsqRLO)

Small scale, we could get a nice iH&S if we retest if the rest line is now support \(the lower RSIs are quite overbought, I guess that is not unlikly\).
Yeesh, futures premium on Mex went from like $90-100 before the BGD to $50 now.
[removed]
Someone wants to stay in that uptrend...
So it blows through 8.2 just to bounce at 8190 (for now)? Am I missing something? 
Still in my underwater short and fully expecting a bgd in the next few hrs. Am I Bitcoining right?

Edit: avg entry at 8070. Rather not say leverage as the shits gotten awfully close
Doesn't look good for bulls to be honest, expecting us to breaking down $8.2k any second now. Have 9 relevant tabs open, ready to place my leveraged short on multiple exchanges when it does break down. Really excited, I have these funny feelings within me!!
This market is so fake. It has been painfully clear these past few weeks. Still going to make money on it but it is total bs.
Very risky range to open a position here. I think we might retrace about $150-$250 momentarily as traders are not looking interested to buy at the current price. 
Alts on GDAX are pumping.  Hopefully, this is news of a BTC pump!
Feels like we've been hovering around 8.2k for over a week now. I counted at least 8 passes on 4h candles.
Compared to the last few that recent "B"GD was pretty weak. Buyers are definitely running out of steam. Sadly I won't let myself get into position before this gay ass market picks a proper direction. Shorting looks good right now, but you never fucking know. 
Rubbish Sundays usually start with a late Saturday tumble. Amirite?
btc hit 814xx, which is a good thing from the prospective of a bull

it needed to cool off if its going to break the resistance to move up, which would be very hard to do without a small drop as the one we had just now

the stoch on the daily keeps telling me that this is the end of correction 

the fib level from our last run up is 0.5 and is holding well, and 0.618 level was almost hit just a day or two ago.

i was expecting it to hit 0.78 to start the upwards movement but that might not happen

i might be wrong but these are the points behind my decision to go long 

edit: grammar

edit: on top of that the resistance that held on 14.09.17 and 05.02.18 is holding again, and doesn't seem like btc is going to break it anytime soon
And after being a strong support 8,200 became a strong resistance, yet again...

Edit: What concerns me is that I was expecting this drop because of ETH, but it did not break down yet.
I don't think the logic of everyone expects x to happen thus it won't happen
is bulletproof , everyone expected a short squeeze and that's exactly what we got
 
With volume this low is it possible to have a BGD tonight? 
[removed]
~~It seems that GDAX has become a little more active and leading the movement at certain times since consensus. Could it be that the new financial products have attracted new players? Or am I imagining things?~~

Edit: lol, I just saw the 24hr volume on GDAX. wtf I'm an idiot.
I hope bears realise crypto is a bull commodity. Anyone who has been long or midterm bullish/long on bitcoin has ALWAYS made a KILLING. Same can not be said for bears or long/midterm shorts/bearishness; 99% of them eventually get rekt. Shorting crypto is extremely risky as history is witness of... bull coming soon. Anyone still short now is simply gambling and might soon lose everything and go into a state of depression and frequent suicidal thouts and tendecies!
[removed]
Got in as it was breaking but this looks like a fake out.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
If the patterns continue I am looking for a spike back up between now and 8240ish, perhaps back to 8400...anything lower could be the cancellation of the potential breakout
Bulltrap. Crazy how ppl still fall for these. Holding my shorts until sub 6k
Break above 8420 could prove to be fatal for bears!
i feel like we are having a lot of newcomers on this sub who just downvote comments just to downvote them

mods is there anything you can do it about it? at this rate of downvoting we will have no traders left to share their opinions
Bart
[removed]
Why do bitmex futures almost always have a positive premium? I would imagine it would more commonly have a negative premium as miners can use it to hedge their mining operation by shorting, thus providing them a less risky, guaranteed return. Any ideas? 
Woah - wicked at 8468 on bfx - shorts closing?
Hey guys...quick question if you don't mind. Does anyone know if there are any exchanges you can use leverage on as a NY citizen? Thanks. 
This action on Bitfinex, first buy walls than sell walls... which psychology is behind that?

First 400 BTC buy walls, that 500 BTC sell walls, now a 1k buy wall. than everything gets removed... market makers and their games..
Bbonds are very tight right now

another big move is coming, and it's unlikely to be bearish 
50 bought at $8350 just now GDAX, whoa
https://www.tradingview.com/x/5tz1S7hf/

With 5 consecutive 3-day red candles, I can't help but to think this thing is going down further
[removed]
[deleted]
I don't think any of the regular traders here care much about the comments from the peanut gallery.  Theres no reason they would care about some guy who doesn't have the balls to post their trades telling them they got it wrong after the fact.  
I like it too even though I’ve been banned for having a few too many drinks. Y’all are helping me learn and understand crypto! So thanks!
here here
I too feel a connection to this sub, even if I’m mostly just a lurker. It’s a nice little community 
>To the ones who come here to start some shit or laugh at others (you know who you are, the list is short, but your names are not worth mentioning)... I pity you... I really do.

I totally agree.  [Here is a perfect example.](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ikz1u/daily_discussion_friday_may_11_2018/dystv3e/)  This guy came on calling other traders stupid for exiting their long when the market dropped hard and fast.
Dawww. I hope I made your list 
Happy cake dayt!!
I've just started using the report function a lot more often. I'm hoping the mods appreciate it.
You’re one of my favorite people on this sub. I know we just met and I’m a no one, but maybe one day maybe we can connect via social media or something.

Cheers ya fuck 
best post today!
Except many of the posts aren't hindsight, they are the same people like myself, openly saying for a long time that we will be going down and down some more and that this is far from over.  Comments which are consistently met with a legion of down\-votes from people like yourself.

You can understand we are not surprised when the price continues to drop as predicted, but we are surprised that for some reason yourself and other can't see what is plainly obviously happening in front of your eyes.

You reference the "people who matter in here"...by that you mean those that post blind positivity day in day out?  Because that's what you want to hear?  Or your beloved "Chewy"?  Who appears to be the baby Jesus reincarnate to many around here, yet he is also wrong more often than not.

Don't pity us though, we actually pity you, as we make money whilst the chaos unfolds, but you still hold onto blind hope and positivity when the reality is very different, I see your trades of late have likely racked you up a decent size loss, I know who I'd pity in that situation...
> To the ones who come here to start some shit or laugh at others (you know who you are, the list is short, but your names are not worth mentioning)... I pity you... I really do.

Rude


Don't think the money would retreat into btc, but the eth's decline would be faster than BTC as is normally the case. I'm also worried about the volume, but thins it's largely an emigration from GDAX to alternatives. 

I actually think eth is holding up pretty well today and the rejection of the resistance is light. I think both BTC and ETH will try their resistances again later today or tomorrow. Personally, I expect another leg down, but I'm willing to trade whatever the market tosses my way. 
I think BTCs weakness is just because of the poor product. Every other blockchain is getting bigger and better, so I think money is just in general shifting away from btc and into fiat or alts
Sounds like Peter is leaning more towards a breakdown from that symmetrical triangle.
Nice chart, that's exactly what I'm hoping for too. Nice reset to load up a little at good prices and then off to challenge the top. Though I'll probably take some profit at the top of the range and then put some stop buys after the resistance if we break through.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
2nd chart.. start at 5800 low, cut off wick. Take on to 6500 and past. This gives you the biggest fattest beer goggles descending wedge ever in bitcoin-land
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
This post could have been written in 2013, and almost none of that has happened in the last five years, but keep believing and maybe some of it will come true.

>  That's where the next battle will be.

Actually, China and India and many countries already fought that battle.  And it consisted of making a law and signing it...and game over.
I can’t remember the last time I made money trading off 15min or 1hr candles. I get shaken out too much. Much more susceptible to manipulation. I make money trading the 4hr and the daily though. More reliable supports and resistances. Chart patterns more reliable as well.
I've been reading about 3d candles for a while now. Is there a YouTuber or something that made them popular?  I have never in 10 years of trading looked at 3d candles
Nice patience man.
[deleted]
BCH is fucking tearing it up 
In this case I'm watching to see if Eth breaks up from its 1hr bband as  a potential leading indicator (not that I believe that theory but I'll take any information I can get)
ETH basically retraced the whole dump from this afternoon.
why do you close your 7950 long? where did you close it?
nice timing on that one.
stops under the flag around 8130?
Hey chew. Followed you on this trade. Was contemplating all day and your post made me pull the trigger.

Question: If we get below 8200 again, would you say 7800 (with a good bounce) is a safe bet. My reasoning is that the range since Wednesday is wideining imo. First it was 8200-8400 now its 8000-8400.

Wouldnt be surpsied to see 7800 - 8600 soon. Maybe pump to 8600, then drop to 7800 or the other way around?
I thought regulars in this thread move around in lambos not trains... what a disappointment
Bullish!
lol, you overdo it! :D 
I'm jealous. Congrats tho.
Royal Wedding obligations for the TRUE whales!
Fucking grats dude.
Are you ok 
Yeah idk, it's teetering on the edge of the resistance but the rejections isn't particularly harsh. 
Same here, but i shorted eth instead so i got way worse since eth rose much more. Also re shorted the top but not much higher then where i got stopped. I need this to go to 8150 just to make up for the losses and hope that eth follows. 
be carefull, as far the res line I showed below might turned support now. I dont think after our crazy 8.45k spike we just drop into the 8.1ks again so fast... but I might be biased, I am long. 
BitMex does not increase your leverage dude

Your margin loses value when the price drops, so your leverage goes up automatically (since your margin is worth less)
I'm really trying to understand the math behind this, so bear with me please:

Available Balance = (Margin Balance - Order Margin - Position Margin)

- Margin Balance = (Wallet Balance + Unrealised PNL)
- Order Margin = value of all open orders, divided by the selected leverage
- Position Margin = entry value of all contracts, divided by the selected leverage, plus Unrealised PNL

Available Balance = (Wallet Balance + Unrealised PNL) - (valueOpenOrders / Leverage) - (valueContracts / Leverage + Unrealised PNL)

Available Balance = Wallet Balance + Unrealised PNL - (valueOpenOrders / Leverage) - (valueContracts / Leverage) - Unrealised PNL

Available Balance = Wallet Balance - (valueOpenOrders / Leverage) - (valueContracts / Leverage)

- so if I'm not touching the Wallet Balance (no depositing/withdrawing), nor the Leverage, nor do I have any other Open Orders
- then the only way for my Available Balance to go down while in a position, would be if the entry value of my Contracts goes up
- but the _entry_ value of my Contracts can't possibly change by itself, right? I mean it should stay the same, regardless of price movements, bacause it's based on my _entry_ price.

So... the Available Balance can _only_ go down if I mess around with Orders, while in a Position?
I'd argue its a bull flag. 

https://hitandruncandlesticks.com/bullish-flag-formation/
I was thinking the same, but I think it’s a blow off top with bull flag. Looks like it will break down imo. Out of a position for now
? seems low?
$8055? 

Do you mean $8255?
> $8,055.

uhh so low? ;\)
Thanks for the heart attack chew :)
drunk whales were splashing in deep waters.
Starting to get very frustrated.
We have a new generation of hodlers. 
Feels like April again! April 2017 that is. 
Always manipulation at the end of candles. This was the end of the 6 hour candle. Happens before day closes too. It's to paint pictures on the chart to manipulate traders.
>new buyers

I'm going to guess probably not. pump always happens at this time in the morning in Bitfinex. it's probably the same exact dudes
On Bitfinex a ~500 BTC short market closed, probably the one that opened yesterday. It was perfectly timed with the new 12h/6h/4h candles. The close price of a candle is relevant to many indicators.
250 Million $ are ready to get thrown on the market...
Well it means there's also few people selling at this price, so you could look at it from both sides. Though personally I'm inclined to believe that it means more downside. 
we're about to make a huge move imo. like volume we haven't seen in weeks/months 
Up or down, I just want a trend though. Not this barting shit. 
excellent 
Wow really rode those waves!
It's just momentum very slowly shifting. I bet reasonable traders are waiting for the 1D macd to cross etc. before going in.
Got a feeling this will be one grand fakeout and we are primed to break the 10k resistance line soon.

I’m out of a position, but I can imagine one more test of 8200 is in the cards before we make a run for the line
Every good trader has a system. But nobody is going to share it. It's literally a trade secret ;)
Yes. Don’t trade intraday candles. The intraday sentiment (price action) doesn’t reflect the market’s true sentiment. Only zoom in to look for entries or exits. The bots and manipulators rule small timeframes, and you can easily be shaken out if you’re relying on a support line on 15min candles. The people who post here every day I must think are trading 15 min candles because they’re daytrading and have new thoughts about the price action constantly. The people who post once a week or less have a trade idea that is potentially weeks in the making. Intraday is just noise until a vital support or resistance line breaks on their chart.
Any trader will tell you that they often lose more trades than they win. The goal, however, is to lose small and win big. Not sure what you mean about people saying they expected to get stopped out. Getting stopped out is a precautionary move to prevent greater losses. Better to get stopped out and have the price drop another $500 so that you can accumulate even more at a much lower price than have to wait until the price comes back up to get profit. Sometimes TA can help you to make educated guesses which way the market will move, but (particularly with crypto) the market can move against trends at any time due to outside influences (FUD, Bullish news, etc.).
Personally I never Tethered and only play alts vs BTC in order to maximalise bitcoins. I do swings between two price levels and most of times it will hit your price even if you need to wait a few days. The worst situation is bagholding. And sometimes you miss the moon missions because you sold at 10% profit. I managed to grow my bitcoins that way and sometimes I cash out a little bit.
That was for the day trade stack. I have an hodling stack as well, on cold storage.
It's been working pretty good for me. When I'm rich I will play BTC/USD with another dedicated stack for this. Sorry my grammar.
you're not going to see many quality posts during low volume chop   
i think the people you are referring are inexperienced traders boredom trading
I trade the opposite of this subs sentiment as I really think larger traders monitor social media for signals.
no.

the only ones that make money are:

1. people with information on next pump and dump.
2. people who are lucky and get into the right position near the pump and dump
3. hodlers who slowly sell off their positions in reality, and realize gains to buy lambos
 
I used to have a system, but now kinda wing it:

I used to buy the dip and sell the tops

Was very profitable

Now the dip just keeps dipping to the point where I close longs because Im just afraid of going in. its insane

and the tops just keep topping until I’m too scared to sell due to FOMO. *looking at you 10k*
another bart completion would be bad for morale
nice timing
His entry was $8,200 if I am not mistaken?
He said he planned on adding later 
i'd think that he will wait for a better exit, patience is definitely his strength

i wouldn't expect btc to go all the way to 9-10 from now on, it still has to have a couple bearish waves on the way there 

edit: by bearish waves i do not mean going below its resistance turned support
Woah Woah I didn't expect this simple comment to spur a controversy
HODLing is just not worth it either though... and those are your only option. HODL or trade

You make profits and losses, but if you follow the regulars in here, you will have more BTC than through HODLing + life lessons + tangible trading experience
there is only so many times this thing hits $8k before it breaks through for good 
8k is the target of the spartan helmet formation on the 1h.
Pretty sure the next cycle will be more like 7200 to 8700. 
i feel like the equilibrium pattern will break sooner, more like early june.
Because our rate of descent is decreasing, forcing these lines to cross when you extrapolate. 

OR it's a black hole which sucks in all lines. 
this pump is insane! sub 4000 btc 24hr on GDAX!!! 
What volume?
I bought in when you posted this. Not sure when to sell. Seems like not much resistance going upwards. 
don’t forget about:

- Korean exchanges are all insolvent
The whole tether thing is still a thing people think.
> I posted this before but it seems like a ton of people were caught off-guard by us going past 8300

How do you get caught off guard by a less than 1% rise?
What formation do you see on the ETH chart? Is it a wedge, a flag? Looks like a big fat bear flag to me.
Shits been whistling for days now.
Deff a risky place to open a long... maybe even a risky short too
Reminds me of how volume died in 2014 and really started to ramp up again when we couldn't break resistance and went on to make new low after new low.
GDAX gonna drop under 4K 24H volume. Wow
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Super low...bots trading?
Record lows? Volume is still at 15B in crypto. BTC volume is also not any lower than it was before April 6th.
you can trade the futs premium rate by long/shorting swaps and short/longing futs
I bin looking at those new mex contracts. They essentially allow you to bet on volatility which can be interesting. Problem is you can only bet on volatility(kind od) not the lack thereof. 
We could expect some horizontal support at 7600/7500 though the next fib isn't until 7300-ish. below that 7000 should prove significant support, and if that falls, all aboard the express to goblin town!
It's doable but obviously has its risks. on the other side if the market makes a big jump in your direction. You can hit the jackpot as well as getting the maker fee. Not a very risk averse strategy though.
I am so glad I am from a place where none of this exists or matters. A place where tax evasion is the national sport and we haven’t been in a war in centuries. Why can’t the swiss just run the whole world... they’ve obviously proven they know what they’re doing.

Hopp Schwiiz
what will happen if you do not hand in these forms?
[deleted]
Here ya go: https://www.tradingview.com/x/xcDBxAa5/

Could very well be, depends on whether we will swing all the way down again or break the upper boundary here. I'd say if we go below 8200 we'll be on a downward trajectory that will results in double-bottom/lower low.
take off 50% at least, daily wants down, weekly wants sideways so we will probably get more chop so the best is probably just to take profits whenever you got them
Yes I would hedge it with a short if you want to preserve entry. Place stops/liqui appropriately. Breakout will more than make up for the small loss while if we go down you haven't lost any profit realistically and you have your delicious entry. 
Sit on your hands and wait for a decisive move. Just make sure you have stops in place so you can either make a small profit or break even if it goes the wrong way.

A second option is to close a portion of your position for profit.
Close 50%, use them profits to buy BTC, put in a wallet, don’t touch for 5 years, and let the rest of your profits ride with stops at 8050-8100 
Better to sit out and wait for a good entry than rush to make it back. I did that this week and only paid off when I was patient. 
That's nothin'. Those two Aston Martins are barely worth half of the watch fluffpony was wearing...

https://www.reddit.com/r/Monero/comments/8kefgt/rfluffyponyza_wearing_a_884k_watch_at_consensus/
As delusional as many of the Bitcoin cultist permabulls are, the buttcoiners are probably about twice as bad.  They occasionally make a good point, but then they go over the top with their "criticism" and it really is absurd and laughable.
You got it now.. it's just reversed.
I’m sure that Crypto traders took a break from the charts to watch the royal beheading
Tabtrader. Nice charts and very easy to set alerts.
I use drakdoo for mobile charting and alerts, it hasn't ever failed me.  But only has 1min frequency.  I'm unsure if it uses a server side push or if your phone is checking the network every minute, but I think the latter because I think I noticed worse battery when an alarm is set.
Idiots downvoting question that I bet a lot of people are interested in here. 
Bitcoin checker I get the same timeout as you but most of the time it's not that bad, tab trader is nice too, if you trade a lot you might be interested in cryptowat.ch, when hou set alarm you'll get them by sms too
Delta is good!
~~Blockfolio~~ (scrap that idea based on veltrops comment)

Delta? https://getdelta.io/
Coinbase has a price alarm
red... bull?
Big bear?
especially because most of that energy is being overproduced and/or coming from green energy sources.

Bitcoin energy consumption is a non-issue.
I mean you can care about both....? Lots of people don't see bitcoin as anywhere near useful as large container ships
People love to shit on the new hip thing. It’s a bit like when a women gets attacked by an uber driver it makes the news yet it wouldn’t have in a regular taxi. It’s about what’s clickable and hot, not about the rationality behind the reporting. 
I have always assumed those articles and statistics are close to 100% bullshit.  They are just designed as anti crypto propaganda to turn the public against it.   And of course it works in many cases.


Lack of understanding regarding BTC power consumption is the best sign someone knows just enough to miss the entire point.

Hint: BTC is fatally flawed
Hope so. Almost pulled the trigger and bought the other day.  Hoping to add a bit more cheaply now.  
This means we will bounce hard! 
༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ BTC TAKE MY ENERGY ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ
Nice to see some self-reflection like this; it's pretty rare here. Saw you posting yesterday several times sentences like "It's not only not going to bounce, it's going to drop today", and was surprised by the absolute conviction. It reminded me of several occasions on which I was absolutely sure that e.g. a given line "has got to" be retested by the market – and it simply didn't happen.

Markets are never deterministic, and the use of deterministic phrases for price development is a good indicator of someone either shilling their position (you're not) or on the verge of becoming overly married to their theory of how the market will develop.
new rule for these moves, buy during the dumps and never chase the pumps

I wouldn't buy anything above $8K at this point 
Sucker rally ...again.
six month chart is a huge symmetrical triangle preceded by a large move down innit? 
Altcoin hype was the catalyst last year, it'll be the same this year. Lots of major milestones on big, hyped projects in Q2. Whether you think they're all useless pumps and dumps or there might be something of substance, there's big money in those, and BTC is still the primary liquidity provider. 
We broke 10k after our first drop to 6k tho. 

I think breaking 20k will be the new headline (catalyst) if we get there. 
No one but trolls have said bitcoin is dead. Who are you trying to convince?
Coin is dead, the blocks are to full and the mining so to much

No one goes there anymore its to crowded 
So just because bitcoin uses energy and an insane amount of resources, it's not dead? That somehow provides usefulness? That's not usefulness, that's a waste. Similar to my grandpa on life support. Hey-o!
Not dead, just mortally wounded.
The possibility that BTC never reaches ath again, or even 10k, is a bitter pill to swallow for many people. 
Also funny how BTC goes down a couple of hundred $ and people are again implying a crash to 1k or whatever and keep comparing it to the 2014/15 bear market, even though they're not that similar to each other.

Bulls get a lot of shit for being "delusional" and other meme words, but bears are exactly the same, thinking that there's absolutely no way that BTC will reach ATH again. This kind of posts are just as fucking pointless as all those "moon" posts that you complain about.
The potentially concerning thing is that we broke down from our (admittedly quite steep) short-term uptrend line, and then bounced off of it as a new resistance. Still too early to tell, but certainly makes the earlier bounces look like simple oscillator resets rather than genuine breaks upwards, this.

https://imgur.com/a/dbrdBBZ
High volume node around 8100, should find some support there.
!short XBTUSD close 8425
that was one fat finger

/u/l14dy There's that bart you feared.

It's trying to break out of the falling wedge but idk if it'll have enough steam (obviously ignoring the spike just now)

chart : https://www.tradingview.com/x/ggZvppcF/
On the other hand we crossed the 50-day MA to the upside with this reach (orange line):

https://www.tradingview.com/x/r6iZc36J/

Last time it happened was on April 20, and we got a big move upwards after that.
where is it?
Amen bro
I admit that I think this is deserved, but I have learned to embrace ETh. I now write 1 solidity smart contract per day. Today I wrote a tree sig contract. It’s not my cup of tea, but I will keep going.
It just bounced way higher than BTC did on that big green candle...

https://cryptowat.ch/markets/bitfinex/eth/btc
> When it was 8100 everyone was super bearish , now when it’s 8200 everyone suddenly became bullish.

Not to be pedantic, but saying "everyone" switched is absurd.  I haven't seen a huge shift in the posts here.  The hodlers will always try to grasp of every straw of hope, but most traders here have not changed their sentiment that much.

I am still holding a short position and will not get shaken out of it unless we move consistently higher.   

Over course $8000 could be the low for the next several years....of course $6000 could be it or $3000 or $1000.   But the chart doesn't suggest a change in trend just yet.
It's called schizophrenia. 
I still have it at 350... Thnk we'll grind up a bit more towards 300 and then go back down to 7800.
I've got it at $8400 in Finex.    I'm not sure if that is the "original" one you are talking about, but the one from $9950 is the one I am referring to.
Binance is gross too. I’ve never seen it this low 
something something calm before the storm
GDAX volume just fell into the 3 thousands.  Unbelievable.  ..Just when it seemed it couldn't get any lower.
With the volume as low as it is, I don't think it will break out in either direction
up ! but im looking at the weekly and its probably weeks away. can see a $1000 move down before i change my mind
I vote 9700!
Nice setup for a inverted hs. Slow bleed down and big pump up.
The current uptrend is pretty steep and we’re pushing up on very low volume. I’d be surprised if we didn’t start going down at that time. 
less than 48 hours ago i'm pretty sure you were talking about how you were about to lose so much money.
funny how a small % move can make you feel differently about the future
Feel sorry for you man. Hope your leverage was not too high.
https://www.nbcnews.com/tech/tech-news/study-claims-bitcoin-uses-much-energy-ireland-not-so-fast-n875211
It can use some forms of energy that would be otherwise unprofitable.
Think of renewable energies or hydroelectric dams in rural China, Quebec, or some US states  that have surpluses, etc... 
Thank god, I was worried that my cerished beliefs wouldn go an hour without seeing criticism by an idiot and get all weak on me
Any solutions to the energy use issue?
price hovering exactly at the middles of the two last up and down wicks (8140+8450/2). Is it a bot? Me think not.
again... username checks out

But you’re not wrong

If you are mad, go take lightning for a spin
it looks like that right now but we are in consolidation, should get a break out soon(tm) which should improve things massively. I'm thinking within 2-3 weeks
Again, I said the same thing through most of last year.  There was rarely organic volume.  Then suddenly out of nowhere you would have massive volume, pumping up the price 8-10%.  It was bullshit then and bullshit now. 
I took profits on my long and have buys set for 8050, 7980 and 7930.

Maximum pain awaits everyone imho.
If I had to bet on up or down, I would bet down.

If I was in your position, I would close. I’ll eat a loss any day if it means I dont have to obsess anout my position. The only winning trades I’ve ever had thay were in the red for a significant amount of time were when I went to sleep and woke up in the green. Otherwise, I can’t stomach the res. Anything over 5% and it’s time for an abortion in my book
yikes that's a tough one. Why not close a portion here to only take a minimal loss?  I'm honestly thinking this'll break down again but theres super low volume so one big mamajama of a dildo and you could be in rough seas. 

Edit: Actually I'd just wait till the close of the hour. If we dont get back over 8300 then I think you'll be fine holding it
This could easily be setting up for a BGD. But this is not advice. Good luck.
I dont know.  downward pressure has been building and building for days and a drop has seemed certain but 8k was never broken.  I still think its coming soon, and the fall will be pretty unpredeticable much like when 9k broke last week or so, yo yoing quickly through the 8000s before resting around a day or so, bart, repeat.

I still think this is too risky to trade either way and i have been in Fiat, and increasing my fiat across coins for the past week.  I am worried to even set buys in the 7000s to close out my shorts.  If you set it and forget it right now you can lose some serious $ if it blows right through down the 7000s.

On the other hand, if there is an uptrend, the market isnt "due " for that so there will likely be a drop after that surge.  Patience and youll be fine.  
test of 8400 then back down again.  from there who knows.
running out of dip buyers/accumulators :P
It will usually be lower on a Saturday than on a Friday on both sides of the order book.
The orders that were on the books were fake to begin with, they always pulled those orders when the price gets close.
Go Celtics and go bitcoin! 

Edit; both are down at the moment. Ha!
Awful game...weird camera angle and way too many commercials for Wells Fargo.
I 2nd this as I’m watching everything move up and no ones commenting. Crickets 
I already stopped watching...but no posts here is mainly because there's nothing to be said/discussed that hasn't been talked about the last 24 hours. Mostly concerning the volume.
For sure. The wider out you go, the clearer it becomes. This is a two year decent to $2500 because nothing is happening between BTC and the real world. But in two years when massive corporations have discovered the savings they can make by using block chain, we’re headed to $200,000 and the second era of crypto begins with ordinary people wanting to use it in their daily lives. 
I don't buy short/long positions, but I offloaded my stack at the start of this downfall and I still believe we will retest  the ~6.9k price point. So I won't be buying now, or if there is a bounce up since I expect that to occur too.

But based on the polls, you'll see just as many who think its going to skyrocket up. I don't see it.. volume is terrible, no shorts to squeeze like last time. There just isn't excitement with the fall from 20k. I think we need at least another 6mo for a big rally up to have a chance.

tldr: our opinions are as indecisive as the price movements.
My mind is telling me noooo

But my body... my body is telling me yeeaaaaaa

My vibe: 7500 is inevitable. It will happen some time this year. I am 100% sure of that (and I realize how ridiculous that sounds)
also holding my long

wouldn't panic just yet, seems like btc is holding pretty well


Edit: closed my long, time to sleep
it could go to $0 before you close 😜
On finex we're back in the channel.  Only wicked out of it. https://www.tradingview.com/x/BLHV0tsi/
On the 1 minute chart I'd call it noise.
Today you’ll learn that TA should not be done on the 1 min chart.
[deleted]
I doubt it... we are the big shots
This sub is most definitely being used for sentiment analysis.  That's why I'm totally bearish right now and about to bet my whole stack short ;).
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Rule 2
Before we get all excited, everything is now just up against resistance.

Its definitely looking promising, but expect a bit of a retrade here. Opening a long here isn't a good position until we clear those resistances.  

Btc: https://www.tradingview.com/x/USbh5fl6/

Eth: https://www.tradingview.com/x/tnZgYuuO/
Are you sure it's not just lagging? 
Rule 2
Opening a short here and will literally close it if the price goes back to 8251. 
.5 fibo and price action support was just below at 8187
where have you shorted?
GTFO of that poo poo at breakeven if you get the chance
pmuchhomme
What's is your target ? sub 1k in a week?
It's been that way for well over a year..maybe two.
Yes! When the market doesn’t go the way you want it to, it is fake! It’s only real when it does what you want it to do!
What's fake about it? Guys sell tons of Bitcoin at a loss just to drive teh price down, then find out that it goes up way faster than it goes down when they have to cover.  How's that fake? That's just Bitcoin doing Bitcoin, transferring money from dumb shorts to smart longs since 2009, baby!
Keeping my current short open and leaving it so for the forseeable future. Not interested in this noice. Also enjoying the greats outdoors is a great way to leave it as is. Almost never been so relaxed.
> as traders are not looking interested to buy at the current price.

Sheesh, that is not a very TA-oriented statement. Have you done a poll on all traders or something, or are you just watching the order book? Sorry to get sarcastic at you, but you really need to provide some charting or something more tangible if you want to contribute to the sub.
that would put us back under resistance 

after the battle bulls had to get out from there that's very unlikely 
As 24H volume on BTC is about to dip under 4K on GDAX lolol
Check out November 16(or 19)~24, even flatter and longer battle for 8.2k, and that was during a bull run.  Though that occurred while taking back new ATHs after a big drop so the stall kind of makes sense.  Anyway, this is an important price point for the market.  After 8.2 was claimed, growth resumed, and became ridiculous parabolic.
It's the bots doing their thing again. It's not a reversal at all. Feel sorry for the ones who fall for it... again...
depends on the ratio partygoers to churchgoers
> it needed to cool off

It is down about 20% in the last week or two.  It's pretty cool already.
I do not think it could become a strong resistance, that too for a long time. 
> strong resistance

How can you say this after we just broke through it and are now slightly below. 8.3k is the resistance. 
Right. So,

https://www.tradingview.com/x/eFHIWtkG/

Btc still has some room to crawl up, but I don't see it passing the resistance as buying pressure is still, well, anal-beads. It might not even reach the resistance and already start heading down as the 4h Macd is already turning down again, however sub 8k the selling pressure becomes minimal. 

For ethereum

https://www.tradingview.com/x/xfq0Dc6y/

 we have passed the minor resistance (purple line) and we're moving to the orange resistance 697. I'm not sure if we'll have enough oompf to pass it, but even then there's still another resistance at 705 by that time. 

I think both will grind up slowly to their resistances on low volume by the end on the day and then start rolling over to the downside of their respective ranges. 

Bonus: ~~Max~~ severe pain scenario for BTC.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/c4tHW9gB/

purple arrows: push to 8499 so everyone and their mom thinks we bottomed, then let it plummet to 7600 so everyone thinks we're going to goblin town and then pump it back over 8k. This would also probably mean that eth breaks down from its H&S formation thus catalyzing the selling pressure.

Personal worst case scenario:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/iyzb4ks7/

Slow bleed to the bottom of our major triangle over the next two/three weeks.

have fun!
Short squeeze is not a product of a collective market decisions though, its probably orchestrated by a couple individuals/exchanges.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
BGD checklist:

* oversold RSI on all timeframes: nope, neutral
* in the zone of a local mid-term low: nope, dead center
* no premium on futures: nope, $50
* shorts chart is in a local mountain peak: nope, going down for days
* shorts still opening but price is making higher lows: nope, equilibrium for open/close today


Some people says that volume comes before a big move, I have often seen a move that start and the volume which comes after as a confirmation and therefore increase the move. 
So, each time I read things about "volume is low, it should dump", I don't really care. 

Still, I'm not a pro trader. Just a thought of mine.
Impossible
[deleted]
Mimimi, holding heavy bags from 9,900?
Rule 1 and rule 3
you knew that before commenting but whatever 
I never short more thsn the notional value of my trading stack, i.e. 1x short
>  Anyone who has been long or midterm bullish/long on bitcoin has ALWAYS made a KILLING.

Then just keep holding, regardless of what the price does.  Good luck...and you will need luck if you put your fate in the hands of other people and the market.

And yes I am short right this second, and I could take a full 1% loss on my current position.   That isn't very risky, imo.
This sounds like a cheap Craigslist add 
Go back to 4chan
it is better to test the log downtrend line now @~7k rather than later this year when it will be @1300^tm .
If we never hit sub 8k we're looking at a new bull run. It's optimistic but I'm hoping that happens.
I’ve found bull divs are a bit more reliable when at, or near a local bottom. 

Depending on the strength of the direction the market takes, divergences can be washed pretty easily if they’re not at key resistance or support zones. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Playing out now?
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Yes too early to call it a failure yet, but it's look like they painted the tape to spike it to the resistance line.  If you really wanted to pump it past that line, you would start $40 below it, not $140 below.  

I am short and not going to cover until it challenges $8400 and holds.

The downvotes... They can't trade to the other side.
Username checks out, back to ethtrader!
Beartrap. Crazy how ppl still fall for these. Holding my long until up 11k
1% loss is not "fatal" for me.
The actual traders in here don't give a shit about downvotes, and they aren't farming upvotes.  It's all about the money man.  The only imaginary internet points that matter are satoshis.
theres nothing anyone can do about downvotes.  people typically downvote whatever goes against the last 24 hours of price action.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I agree, it makes it very hard to share your perspective when people have been so eager to downvote here the past few days. People are definitely having a downvote party right now, just look at the karma on the last three comments and their replies.

(Edit: On second look, the past seven top-level comments have negative karma, actually. I’m not sure theres anything mods can do to combat this though.)
It's always been like that.  Actually bearish posts are not getting as severely downvoted lately, which is surprising. 
Rule 3
Because bulltards outnumber good traders, at least that's my theory.  
3 factors come into play

Because historically btc has gone up enormously longing it has always been better r/r then shorting it for long term positions. 

Secondly because it is safer to DCA down a long as we go lower then to DCA up a short as we go higher. There is no theoretical upper limit.

And most importantly because on average longs usually pay shorts funding so long term long positions are on futures so they dont pay 0.01% of their position every 8 hours. Obviously this swings slightly but if you look at this long term like a lot of big players do longs are paying out a lot more funding then shorts.

Edit: Also the reason I bring up long term positions more is that lower liquidity on futures means short term positions are more likely to be on perpetual while long term positions can slowly accumulate or lower their position without it being a problem since they are making long term moves anyways. 
Yes large bitmex positions got liqudidated
Lucky wick for me. :) Most probably shorts closing yeah.
!short XBTUSD close 8300 

username checks out :)

Kraken, but they suck some hairy fucking testicles
Whales go splash splash
It's called spoofing. Placing fake orders to trick people into buying or selling.


Blonds are very tight? not true.
On which time frame? I see all bollinger bands are pretty shaked out except 15m ones. And 15m does not indicate a "big move" usually.

Also why do you think it is unlikely to be bearish? Any arguments?
you must be new...

On December 7 2017, GDAX had 72000 BTC 24 hour volume.

I have proof!
I'm seeing the giant descending traingle more than anything else: https://www.tradingview.com/x/HFTdYTd8/
[removed]
[removed]
Removed. Rule 3
Well you could also argue that that entire H&S is the right shoulder of a larger inverted H&S of which the drop to 7925 is the head.
You were banned?! lol

I think it was cause you mentioned you're a blonde girl lmao
u were banned for ID theft.
This is very different. I expressed an opinion. I said selling was stupid, not that a particular trader was stupid. I also didn ridicule anyone
PM me... we make it happen bro
I'm not sure what all this is about going down and down. We've been going up and up since February.  I bought $6k and $6.6k (just a little over a month ago) and I'll buy $7.5K if it goes there again.  To me, $20K is just a blip like the ones I've seen so many times before, and it will look just as small as $100, $1K, $3K, $5K and all the rest in due time.

You can draw your line from anywhere. I draw my main one from a few years ago, and my recent one from February's low since that's where I started buying again.  Doesn't look at all like we're going down to me.  Trend seems up.  Bitcoin has rough weeks and months from time to time.  Excellent returns over the past few years and months disagree with your sentiment.

[edit -- by the way, have an upvote just to undo one of the unfair down votes you got for that comment]
It is not rude... He did not mention your name!
aye, seen that. symmetrical triangles are 50/50 i believe (could be wrong).

Im leaning bullish cos if it ends up bearish then the whole market will just get destroyed imo. bulls would be on literal suicide watch, try convincing those poor fuckers to join the market again after.
Where's the volume?

GDAX **4,836** **BTC \-** 24 hour volume

You kidding me? This is getting absurd at this point.

Lowest volume in the last 30 days.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/l35nm9Wr/ 

ik its not perfect but its pretty close imo
You believe in 2013 Bitcoin was mainstream? Governments banning them then would have killed the project

Edit: Which major financial institutions were interested in BTC in 2013?
So much ignorance I’ll let life decide to punish it GOT DAMN.
I'm an Indian. Buying BTC as we speak. You're right, game over! 
Except that this post was written in 2018 and not 2013.
a lot more adoption has happened since 2013. we also have lightning now so we have a clear path for scaling bitcoin. bitcoin has the potential to upend the web for example. micropayments could end the ad funded web. no need to track users and compromise their privacy just to sell ads. accept micropayments for content instead.
Hey thanks man. :)
I agree with this chart
Something the think about.... most people originally had that line drawn this way before we put that diamond bottom under it....

Thats why so many shorts stacked on after we tested it as resistance

and look where we are 🤔

https://www.tradingview.com/x/FMqDQkhK/
That was insane watching it. 
Because I didn't have much faith in buyers to continue moving up. I closed it at $8,090
I'm not super concerned with stops at the moment :)
Dropping below $8,200 would definitely be problematic. 

I'd expect a drop at least to $8,000 to follow, with $7,800 a distinct possibility. 
I missed this entry and decided to short the failure to break (and hold) the resistance line. Short from 8400 on June futures. I'll be concerned if 8400 breaks on spot
maybe he owns the train.  I'm picturing Homer Simpson when he test drove that Bentley to get free spa tickets.

"What advantages does this motorcar have over a train, which I can also afford?"
haha, I’m european and I let my mom use my car this week (not a lambo tho)

Train is faster than car
I'm desensitized.  Overtrading. 

If that short was a 10% loss though I'd be fucking pissed.  Thankfully it wasn't a greedy position.  Semi-glad I had the sense to keep the size reasonable, and to set an "oh shit" stop loss with that wakeup in the middle of the night impulsive [5am trade](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kae50/daily_discussion_friday_may_18_2018/dz7ypgy/).  Though the sl could/should have been a lot tighter. 
Yeah, precarious.
Well, *if* this goes down from the resistance I bet you'll get your chance to balance out.

But we probably need to bail quick if this goes the other way, we might not even get the chance to bail quick.

Considering eth, maybe the market has blown it's load for the day concerning another big jump up.  (that's just a rationalization though)
> do with a credit card drawn line on your phone screen ;)

Hmm nice. ;)

[deleted]
We got rejected off our downtrend line on that spike. Downward-sloping overhead resistance that's been tested 3+ times is a pretty good reason to be short. But I might be biased, I'm short from the rejection at 8400 :P
I don't see support. I only see the resistance line that was briefly pierced, rejected, and is now about $100 overhead.

Edit: downvotes for no chart?
https://www.tradingview.com/x/Yt1SvaTT/
I'm always careful. Resistance from $10K is right overhead. 

The biggest loss I'd take here is 2%.
Ok so the Available Balance absolutely does not change, as long as I'm not touching the Position and not messing around with Orders?

(because that would mean that the Unrealised PNL does not cancel out, in my math above)

P.S. Not taking into calculation the Funding fees.
At this point the flagpole has retraced 60% not counting the wick, 75% counting it.  I think it's on the cusp of being invalidated?

Edit: meh, nevermind, it's normal.
yeah looking heavy as shit without any volume. 
Yup, meant $8,255. 
Either that or a heck of a market stop/wick.
I got the post notification and saw the price. Course, I'm short from 8400 so I was excited!
don't get chopped up before the big move

you'll end up being right about the direction and you'll be flat with no position cause you overleveraged and got impatient 

but yes this is extremely boring and frustrating 
I’m bailing on my short for tuna sub profits. 
!short xbtusd close 8260

I’m sitting this one out. 
We did it guys!
if every weak hand already sold and no one is willing to buy, then haven’t we achieved some type of equilibrium?

Maybe... just maybe... the fair price of Bitcoin has been found?

Wouldnt that be something 
You missed either /s or "bag".
More like July 2014
So true.

Everyone remember Mrs. Watanabe?
If you know of this manipulation already, why didn't you joined in and went in the same direction?
Printed tethet doesn't mean the price will pump, tether can also serve as get out solution, but yeah usually bullish news. 
this whole space is about fake outs.

it literally could go up/down/sideways. Until the barts stop its not trading, its just gambling 
I think she's going down this time. Sadly.
Depends what the other coin does. Sure doesn't seem like bitcoin is leading the charge anymore.
MAST, Schnore signatures, smart contracts on BTC, right up your alley L14dy... 


https://soundcloud.com/cryptovoices/show-41-jameson-lopp-cypherpunk-bitcoin
I am a professional trader and I can tell you that there are no secrets. People who are looking for a 'secret system' are people who want shortcuts to success. There are no shortcuts. You become a profitable consistent trader by putting in time and working hard.

When people see or read about successful people, they only see their current success. Nobody sees their years of struggle, their darkest periods, the periods everybody would have given up except they didn't. That's the secret.

Trading is not a game, it's a business. Anybody who fails to see that won't succeed.
haha well played!
Agree wholeheartedly with one exception. I frequent this sub because I enjoy talking about the market action and getting insight into how some of the traders here view/project the market movements. I stopped intraday trading for the most part a couple of months ago. 
Is there any place that has advice for trading on longer (day-weeks) timeframes?  Half of the time I can't tell if the advice I read is intended for short time frames or long ones.
If you were "expecting" to get stopped out, then why exactly did you put on that trade?
Yes I do as well. It's actually quite comical how profitable it is. Now I know why broker/dealers make so much bank.
4 Traders that recognize patterns and interpreted signals right.
loooooool
So you're a degenerate gambler, good to know. 
RIP.
that's true in a bear market, if you go back to the bull market that's where holders shine, in a bear market like right now , traders have the chance to out peform holders, not forgeting taxes and fees. If you add taxes and fees i would say an holder will out perform the average trader. But if you have time to spare and have good risk management im sure you can out perform a holder in a bear market
I'm pretty sure it will go up eventually. 8k is the lower border of a falling wedge.

See the purple line.

https://i.imgur.com/aBNp08N.png
Not saying it can't happen, but it won't happen with this amount of volume from the bears. The current drop is still above the lower low. Until that breaks, this could be a bear trap.
And the slope of upward bearflags increasing.

Interesting observation, especially the convergence on the extrapolated lines.  Never noticed this sort of thing before.

If this drops back down again it'd be interesting to try to predict the slop of the next ladder rung by taking its bottom point and extrapolating up to that convergence point (though I think any steeper is too steep to execute)
I can't decide if I need to GTFO or set my short stops high and wait for the *real* volume dump
Wouldn't extremely low volume like this make it easier for whales to pump or dump as they please?  Seems like there would be less resistance
precisely 
oh no...
I don't really see a bearflag, rather a large descending triangle. We just broke through the resistance line though, so I'm expecting some upside with a target of 775, though it could keep going to the recent high and challenge that. We'll have to see.  
I closed my short again because I am so fucking scared of a bart to 8700
It's never that risky if you have the discipline to cut your losers quickly.

Well not "never" because on ETF decision day, it was very risky to be either short or long, but generally it's the case.
well since we got barts as well as bgd and brd everything became much riskier 

yet everyone who had waited for the resistance break out this might be a good spot

it requires balls though

this is not advice
Already dipped below 4000 earlier. [https://i.imgur.com/Xb3hmdY.png](https://i.imgur.com/Xb3hmdY.png)

Something about the price going over $8280?
Doesn’t volume now look very similar to our last trip to 6500? As price bottomed out, volume waned for a few days just before it popped. Thinking up here as well..hoping maybe 
its simple, there are a LOT more holders looking to sell than there are buyers at these prices

eventually some big whale will blink and a general sell off will start as everyone starts chasing a dump 
then you'll be trading the futs premium and not bitcoin volatility. there is an options market at deribit but it is far from developed.
You can bet volatility will go down
7k is goblin town to me, my alts will drop 90% if we reach 7k
Thank you 
It's not true that tax evasion is the national sport here. In my experience, most Swiss people are fine with paying their taxes because compared to everywhere else they are extremely reasonable (saying this as a German living in Switzerland) and for all major tax spendings, the people get to vote on whether they agree with it, so there is much less waste of public spendings than in surrounding countries.

As far as capital gains are concerned, no taxes at all apply here for non-pro traders.

Hopp Schwiiz :)
No idea, but I don't want to risk them closing my account.
Probably because his real life job is a teacher. Summer holidays 
RemindMe! 4 days
lol I like- I actually think 8k is safe due to the trend from 6500 on daily. So far so good anyway
Curious why Ricardo wouldn't put that additional $900k toward delegating + alleviating the time constraints he espouses he has that preclude health optimization.

Wealth != self awareness & reasoning.


damn a RM, I remember him having another expensive ostentatious watch too 
Two ends of the spectrum right?
that might have been the bottom 

have a look at the stochastic oscillator on the 15 min
Well, Mr. Green is talking out the remaining active sellers before the next move perhaps. 
The force is strong with them today!
I'm actually watching it because the charts are so fucking boring.
Lol. And emotions/alcohol. Peoples like to celebrate!

I'll remove my tinfoil hat now ...
Oh thanks for this, just installed it, looks clean! 
That app was sort of community shitlisted after they were exposed of snooping style practices.
Problem I've had with Blockfolio alarms is the delay.  Alarm commonly doesn't go off until a while after the target price hits
That's an oxymoron
they will care when they understand what crypto brings to the world. By then it will be valued in infinite dollar amounts. :)

Isn't that what speculation here in this subreddit is all about!? Just another perspective.
[removed]
very high quality shitpost, hope the mods are asleep a bit longer:))
I agree, the self reflect is a relief.
Most of the time you hear lots of confidence in a particular channel or resistance line which then breaks and they draw a new one and not talk again about how confident they were about the previous resistance line.

mysql101: your insight is welcome and the pattern you found was cool. It could still hold for BTC, we will find out soon.
duly noted
Its held the bottom of 6k well and considering where we were last year I remain bullish. Also if it stays in this range I think it will form good foundations for another move up. 2020 halving, lightening network, increased applications. I'm comfortable with what I'm sitting on.
I think he means 6M candles.
Base of the triangle is strong and well tested twice. Just my view.
Eh I dunno, the ICO market is a lot different this go around, and too many people got burned hard when the bubble popped, and then got stuck holding a lot of bags 

the reason this needs to go above the ATH before it can start pumping again, is to make sure all those bag holders are back in the green so they get their confidence back as the "genius" investors that they aren't, and will start putting more money into crypto and will start bragging to their friends. 

Yeah breaking ATH starts the next bull run and gets the normies back in.

Until then it’ll just be traders, bots and the occasional pump and dump 
He is strawmanning the entire sub.
The guy who posted 3 posts below me;\) The last sentence is not my key message, I found it just interesting to look at these numbers.
The energy is overproduced anyways...

They use energy produced by rivers and dams and build mining farms in remote locations where the energy is produced to accomodate peak usage. They just use the delta.

Why else do miners get free energy bro?
Well if someone else is paying a shitton of money to keep him on life support he is clearly valuable.
Yep, and sweetening the pill with leverage sure dont help. Been there done that. Trying not to repeat. But preaching about the future isnt of much help, after all this is bitcoin were talking about.
lol and for some this is actually not even  possibility

i don‘t think we will see a drop below 6k anymore for real now... i watched this beast long enough from the sideline
I give more weight to horizontal support/resistance lines as they pertain to equilibrium formations (higher highs, lower lows, etc.) than I do log trend lines. Just a philosophical thing when it comes to TA. 
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,225.00

* Average value: 8,225.00

* Closing value: 8,425.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 40.00%

* PnL: -2.68%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I hopped on the train when chewy said 8250. Caught the train at 8253... probably going to
close
>that was one fat finger

how you know? 
I have it crossing at $8415.  If it retakes the line, I'll scale out of my short.  

It pierced it pretty good, but had to run up $130 to reach the line.  So it's tough to hold that and build on it, unless it can just bull flag from here.

I will not be shy about taking a small loss if that's the way it goes.
$8,468, top of the wick at BitFinex. Uhh my bad, not the log resistance. lol.
when ICO


I joke, but that's awesome that you trade and try to build into the platform.  The most bullish thing about crypto is all the talent that is has drawn towards it.
Ok, not everyone but this is the general feel i get as a lurker.
From 350 to 7.8k? Any explanation ?
We had some minor fakouts once, I do not take them into account to draw the line. 
seriously, thought it was a glitch at first 
All the while BitMex volume could put t on a b
Sadly it doesn't work like that...

Although, if you have enough money to spend...
I agree that it's more likely to go down. But then again, Bitcoin likes to surprise us every now and then...
Haha. Mate, I was mapping out my plan B then. Which luckily I never had to use. 
lol price moved 25$ 
Don't feel sorry for me man. :) I am patient, and I still have that strong feeling.

I missed a better entry, but it's okay. I am trading with 3.3x.
To me ,The numbers may be wrong but not by more than one order of magnitude and that’s enough to be a concern
The vast majority of Bitcoin energy use is hydroelectric nowadays, so it's a pretty green coin. Bitcoin miners will always move to places with abundant, cheap energy. 

The only reason why we mentally equate energy consumption with pollution is because fuel-based energy is a lot easier to transport and we aren't able (and willing) to move our cities around all the time to abundant natural energy sources. In Bitcoin mining this equation is false, but good luck convincing fanatic environmentalists of that.
Energy consumption is the solution! Without it PoW doesn't work. If you do not like PoW you can choose between PoS (plutocracy) or PoA (authocracy). 

You have to compare Bitcoin energy consumption  with gold mining, banking, minting, overhead governments, military expenditure and the destruction of whole ecosystems due to wrong incentives (inflation) aka consuming now rather than saving for later.

Now tell me how wasteful our current system is!?

Edit: I am in Bitcoin for quite a long time. It was clear to everyone (back in 2011) that when Bitcoin becomes huge it will consume vast amounts of energy. If you are shocked about this you haven't done proper research. Bitcoin will continue to consume more and more energy and will at the same time make energy markets transparent, more efficient and tradeable around the world.

Money is one of the greatest things our society ever invented. It combines trust (between untrusted parties which is necessary for larger societies), **stored/saved energy** and a means to create and materialize things.
Lowering the block reward
[deleted]
I would be too worried with those buy entires. We already tested those levels once and only climbed up this far, and if we get down there again im feeling like 7.8k is inevitable 
Heavy resistance ahead calls for a major cock block if we pump up. Yet, closing and sitting out and not trading is probably best idea because this is beyond retarded to trade 
I mostly opened the position with intentions this bullshit Tether pump would slowly die down.. it’s put the brakes on a little bit but really hasn’t climbed back down as much as I would have liked. 

This volume is disgusting, i must add
This entire green Dildo from 6800 has been a cluster fuck to trade. Only a few extremely obvious trades hidden between the 6800-10k range, otherwise it’s been a mix of Bart’s and lucky TA calls. 
>  a drop has seemed certain but 8k was never broken.

8k was soundly broken by about 1% on both Bitstamp and Bitfinex.
looks like its about to move down to me

Yes, i'm starting to barrly looking at charts and chopping barts isn't fun. The summer is here and the weather is nice. I will be back in fall and i'm sure, i have nothing missed.
I honestly don't understand how anyone could seriously think the odds are over 50% that we will revisit $20K this year.    
Freddy vs Jason reference? 
Uhm, you realise may will be last time ever in history of eternity of bitcoin that it will be sub $10k, right? Luk meester him self said so and the prophet predicts ath levels within 2 months.
Username checks out.
no have some buy orders at $0.01
The chart is based on Bitfinex. I said original res line, drawn without the fake out wicks...
rgr, thanks
Probably I'll learn that another day, but when I do I'll remember you...
I beg to differ. Provided the volume is large TA can be done on any time frame. Just look at the chart of a random altcoin on Binance during and after a pump. I'm convinced high volume markets exhibit [scale invariance](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scale_invariance).
I see your sell/bear ratio is higher than buy/bull ratio, the market sentiment is bearish! 

Pamp et!
Everyone should do this in each comment. 
There is always a bigger fish :)
Bro you just made a post bragging about your .07 profit today.

A profit, to be sure, but not something worth swinging your dick around and calling yourself a big shot.
Counter trading the sentiment of this sub has been profitable but I'm usually bullish against bearish.
I see what you did there
[removed]
[removed]
And if we clear these resistances, we speak about new resistances, just buy low and try to sell high acts sometimes better. Everybody was waiting for this 7.3k something dip, that was the reason why I did not think it will happen.
You go girl

Werk them charts 
!short XBTUSD 8249 15X 25% 

Perfect timing but am not fucking around with this and will close it at the first sight of shenanigans.
Same, SL super tight around 8320. Targeting 8100s, see how that holds up.

!short xbtusd 8280 10X 80%
Thanks
Looks like we dropped through it.
[deleted]
Uhm, are you being a sarcast? Sub $1k is very unrealistic, if we break down $8k within a few hours, I think $5.8-6.3k is realistic.
I'm making money actually but when the only volume occurs at the end of candles to paint the chart, it is clear it is bullshit. People are just painting the chart.
No, it's always mostly fake.
Yes that is very true. We don't make such claims until things are working in our favor, we only rant about them once they go against our favor. 
> Guys sell tons of Bitcoin at a loss just to drive teh price down

At a loss.
HAHA.

You're cute... Wake up.
I never believe people who say they are leaving a position open until some point in the future.  They are lying to us and to themselves, in most cases.  if market conditions change, there's a good chance you will close the position.


Look at the trading volume before you shoot your mouth off, we are at a 30\-day low today.
It's all good mate. My statements are usually based on consumer behavior rather than being based on TA. 

A poll wouldn't really be able to generate accurate results. I will have to conduct the study with at least 10 item questionnaire. Moreover, a sample size of say 200 has a Margin of Error about 7%. Furthermore, the total population of this sub (lets say if I conduct a study here) is a very small representation of the larger trading population in general.  
Yea, I see... but that was pretty bullish holding a new ATH for a while. Right now, 8.2 feels like it is on life support.
anyone who believes this $300 fart is real is going to be in for pain

bull market will come again, but i doubt it is now
lmao that's what everyone says until it isn't , nothing is certain, you can say it's unlikely to be a reversal (which i agree) , but don't cross the possibility 
I agree with you totally. Idk why i'm getting downvoted lulz
ice cold
Why? We were hitting this point so many times from both directions it is strong as fuck. Unless we see a trend reversal it will be very difficult to break it.
you measure futures premium by % not absolute. 50 bucks is not even a 1% premium
That's all well and good, but with this volume, if somebody decides to fat-finger a measly 500-coin buy, it would drive the price up pretty fast.  It's the weekend so that's not likely either. Just saying.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Low volume has tended to cause a gradual drifting up lately.
Yes, call me up in 2019 to remind me how hard I "lost". Lol. You people are absolutely deranged and delusional.
No, got bags from $6700, $8100 and $9100, so I'm pretty comfy you deranged, projecting scrublord.
Well no because I took it from the watchlist on tradingview. 

Reasoning was the it has recently flipped more bullish compared to finex and in small pumps it outpaced it. however, now just seems a liquidity thing. past 24hrs is EXTREMELY low though.
This guy is a troll. Don't feed him, mate!
This. Regular divs are reversal patterns and hidden divs are continuation patterns. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
If my read on the patterns holds true then the decision will be when we get to the high 8300's...to hold a long for potential move past 8500, or short it because the pattern so far is to head back down for another run toward goblin town
Back to watchpeopledie... wtf.  Ignore.

Edit: check out ethmeplz's post history, people.  It's disgusting.
Just go through the today’s post, it’s insanely huge net amount of downvotes!

could be the case actually

maybe lots of folks are getting rekt with their shorts and dont want to hear anything about bull market 
[removed]
Maybe, I suppose that fact that you can have high leverage also adds weight to your argument.
!long XBTUSD 8230 15x 20%

Opened a hedge long earlier.
Kraken does not anymore. Bitmex and vpn 
https://imgur.com/a/pXGt3P0

pretty sure it's tight enough
has been a good indicator for me lately 

bulls took the control, at least for now, and i think they just needed some time to recharge to continue the rally
>December 7 2017

I googled that date and got this result:  Among the events that happened on this day in history, in 1972 Apollo 17 launches. Likes to a moon rocket video, makes sense: [https://www.cnbc.com/video/2017/12/07/this\-day\-in\-history\-december\-7\-2017.html](https://www.cnbc.com/video/2017/12/07/this-day-in-history-december-7-2017.html)
what do you mean, a 50 BTC buy on one order is a $417,500 purchase, that's a big # to me...
It's on YouTube also, pretty sweet day. 
I heard that triple top/bottom carries less meaning than double counterparts. If we do go down that far, I'm not sure 6k would hold.
I was thinking maybe it was posting her Instagram lol 
how lol
Whatever helps you sleep.  I'd say making a comment like that after a large drop and other traders comment that they just bailed isn't a shining example of good etiquette.

WWSD?


its still rude and undecent to real people, its not nice thing to say or do
it’s insane... it’s all just bots why the whole world HODLs
Holy shit lol 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I thought everyone said we’re bottoming when it get really boring, so I’m expecting it’ll be this for another while 
this is probably biggest issue i think.

most volume is on bitmex meaning no new money coming in, so will be difficult but if we break 10k nicely and media picks up on it then i reckon new money will pile in..

hoping that bitmex degenerates (like me) are enough to blast 10k
Which major financial institutions are interested in it now? and I'm not talking about a crypto trading desk that just wants to profit off volatility fees 

I mean what major financial institutions are long or bullish on bitcoin?

And I'm being genuine. I have looked it up so many times and all I see are speculative articles from websites with "coin" in their domain names. Every non coin related website that has reported on it has detailed why institutional money is staying away or hesitant to invest 
Yes if 1 person in India buys some BTC, then certainly the ban hasn't hurt demand at all.  Heroin is illegal in the USA but people still buy it, so therefore the ban has not hurt demand and buying activity.

Your logic is unbelievable.
His point is that  nothing has really changed since then 
Again, you are talking about fantasies for the future.  People droning on about micropayments was again, what we heard in 2013, but guess what...they still aren't practical, five years later, and no sign that they are going to be.  

I get that Bitcoin has failed to even come close to living up to its promise.  It's always talk about what will happen in the future, not its current utility, because vague promises of the future is all you have.

good move
!short xbtm18 close 8360

!short xbtm18 8400 5x 50%
Stops in place so i'm prepared for the worst. Going away for the weekend and won't be controling my position. When i get home sunday night i'll either be very happy or very pissed... 
Was this really meant for me? 
Bitcoin likes to reject downtrend lines and then dildo right through it. Very possible we will take it down on the next try... if there is a next try.

I honestly dont understand why you guys hold positions for so long in this market. With all these barts, I open and close within a couple hours. I dont trust the price of Bitcoin ome bit. Every time I look at Bitmex, I think it’s a typo
He's going off the original way to draw that line, which just connects the first two peaks.  (I think it's a rationalization to hold the position)
Can I ask why you didnt close your long at 8350-ish? With resistance being right there seemed like as good a place as ever to close the long with the intent to reopen above 8400
> Ok so the Available Balance absolutely does not change, as long as I'm not touching the Position and not messing around with Orders?

Correct. Margin in a position is there, but no other account balance is taken on the order unless you add it.
It’s all just bots... it’s a joke
Would have been one hell of a wick 
Knocked me out of my long. Had stops at break even - and future premium was much higher when I opened it, so got a bit screwed on this one. Contemplating flipping short here. 

!long XBTUSD close 8250
the big move will be up imo.

We will ladder down to 7500 and then we will see one hell of a bounce that will fall short at 9k+

I dont think I will have the nerve to trade it, but that’s what I see happening
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,280.00

* Average value: 8,280.00

* Closing value: 8,260.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 80.00%

* PnL: -0.01%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Time for the adoption cycle then. 
I see buttcoin is getting to you 😂
More like November 1984.
Just because you know the price is clearly being manipulated doesn't mean you know who is doing it or which direction they will choose next.
You can gamble with odds in your favor though.
Actually btc held position while the other pumped and when btc pumped, the other pumped some more.

oh wow, dope
But look I completely agree. What I'm saying is that nobody is going to explain in public, in a forum, what types of analysis they use and how they decide their trades. 
And that's because as you said traders go through a baptism of fire when they start, and not all survive it with enough capital to go to the next step.

PS I was not talking about secret formulas :) Just that each trader develops his own system, whatever works for him.
read my advice :) I like to find longer term entries and focus on holding my positions for weeks to months.

I have had my position open for about 5 weeks now. shorted $9700 on swaps 
Check out a YouTube channel called "The Chart Guys". Their daily videos generally cover both long and short-term timeframes.
because you’re gambling 
My point was that no one "expects" to get stopped out. It's an insurance policy in case the market goes in the opposite direction to what you think it will.
I knew a guy that could buy like 50 lambos, he went long right when futures was going live knowing bitcoin was going to crash and he held the position all of the way to the crash at 6k.

Now he can only buy like 16 lambos.

He said he knew it was gonna happen and he expected to lose all of that money.
Social sentiment is always a step behind.
those are covered by #2.
I’m better than you. That I know 
He is a very patient trader that's all I know about him. 
In a bear market, every trader that doesn't lose money outperforms all holders.
I was opening 10x longs in the bull market and had 100% ROe multiple times per week
Holders shine in a bear market too after a certain amount of time.  We're like, "$6k. Hmm, still 25x more than I paid. Think I'll buy some more."
that purple line conveniently ignores touching the lower low at 7900

thats the pivot point, at that point it will either BGD up or BRD down. 

since we are on the way down since getting rejected at $9,800 something tells me it'll be a BRD(just as soon as it pierces the support at $7,800...which by the way no longer has the 6000-8000 BTC buy walls it used to have)


Uptrend is broken, but horizontal low is in place, yes. We're right back into our zone from yesterday, but if that falls (sub 8150), I'm not sure why anything else would hold.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/a28Dz9YE/
be ready for a fakeout to stop u out then the real dump or pump. 

remember $7.2k to $6.7k...then crawl up to $6.9k...think it dumped to $6750 again. then  boOOM

Just remember that low volume crawl up/down indicates stronger hands are generally getting their positions filled very patiently 
Asking myself the same question. 
It’s a ticking time bomb 
Depends if liquidity is still there. If the order books are just as stacked but no one market buying/selling, pump or dump is actually harder 
good game
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
futs premium is a proxy for bitcoin volatility
How so? 

Ps dude lemme know when your ready for a chat about that script.
it’s just a joke ;)
Most likely. Can’t have his phone out to check all the time, same for charts up on the screen.
I will be messaging you on [**2018-05-23 20:58:10 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2018-05-23 20:58:10 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kiwgl/daily_discussion_saturday_may_19_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kiwgl/daily_discussion_saturday_may_19_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  4 days) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! dz94s7m)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
If it's spot on I want you to tag me as the wizard. 
because bacon is delicious 
Ah, the bottom again. Up a few % here should be just enough to bring out the moon map again.

Edit: I just realized that I actually need to clarify that this was sarcasm. Sad. 
Tom Hardy went to the wedding bald as fuck

Clooney’s wife is so hot in yellow

Fuckin idris elba looking like he owns the place
I love how the app's view just *is* a chart rather than embedding a chart in a child widget.  Totally changes the experience, really easy to pan/zoom around.  And the graphics of the candles are rendered more orderly than other apps I've tried which all seem glitchy.
Oh wow, didn't know that, thank you. I'll look into that.
making an energy drink called greenbear 
bears= matador, FUD = muleta
[removed]
No sorry I did mean the 6 month chart. Just seen it happen so many times after a violent move up. However completely agree that a move below 6k is not good at all but pretty confident that level is well defended.
well we just got rejected hard off the top again and I'm not sure a support line will hold 3 times. we'll see, if it breaks down we will get some cheap bit corn 

So this is totally anecdotal, but I'm mingling quite a lot in the crypto meetup / ICO shilling meetup scene, and it's very different now than it was a year ago indeed, but maybe not in the way you're expecting.

Last year, most of the meetups were mainly younger nerd-types, your stereotypical Bitcoin investors basically -- libertarian-minded IT folks, with a spattering of students or dead-end job wageslaves hoping to 'make it'. Recently, I'm seeing more and more VC guys, bankers, market analysts, etc, mostly dudes in their 40s-50s, many of them looking at this as the *precursor* to what will be the new dotcom bubble. A lot of them aren't even in this for the money (they've made their fortunes a long time ago), but rather looking to relive the thrills of the dotcom era, and they're playing with sums far bigger than the pocket change folks were throwing at ICOs last year. 
[deleted]
No not really. I could pay a shit ton of money for a dumpster fire, but that doesn't make it "valuable"
Jesus fing boooo. Good for you. Can’t believe it went to 8300 again 
Yeah don't see it climbing much higher than 375 to be honest, unless if you managed to close in that wick, haha.
Making breakfast right now but will post my chart  when I finish. 

Basically etch has just crossed a small resistance, but still has a larger resistance up at 700.

Btc has the upper downtrend line in the falling wedge at about 350 as of now, and I expect another leg then to make a three wave drive as moves of btc often play out. Of course this is only what IM expecting, could play out differently.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
That is good then :\) This also might be a fake out!
How is proof of work functionally different from PoS when you can just acquire more mining infrastructure with more money? I've never really understood that

Like in terms of avoiding a central authority
^ exactly this, everytime I look out from my windows I see tall buildings with lights on
PoW is the exact same plutocracy as PoS except it wastes energy. The elite that can spend millions on mining farms are exactly the same as the elite that can park millions on staking wallets. 
That's one of the craziest self-convincing pieces of bullshit I've ever read. Saving energy is actually an issue today and progress is being made. Bitcoin is moving in an opposite direction, spending without producing anything of value. And please don't try to say that doing pow is actually somehow valuable in itself. We all know it isn't and luckily smart people are working to solve that. That's the simple truth of it. 
you can spin up a simnet or regtest node.

Takes like 30 seconds. just use (if you use lnd)

btcd —txindex —simnet —rpcpass=kek —rpcuser=kek —mining-addr=<addr>

You’ll get your own simnet coins that way

And there were usable lightning codebases in June 2016. Go check Scaling Bitcoin 2016 and roasbeef was demoing functioning lnd clients.

They added onion routing, mac based secret sharing, they wrote an entire lightning spec and built three clieny implementations to those specs, they added macaroons, they added autopilot and a bunch of apis for abstractions...

But keep listening to what people told you instead of doing your own research
Yeah, any preset buys in that range, I would hope would be making room for a DCA plan down to 6800.  Or ready to bail quickly on them.
the entire market is entering the “beyond retarded to trade” area.

If I wasnt making any money, I’d deff stop
Eh I guess so, but barely.  I mean a real break down that many (including me) are/were expecting.  
The ONLY catalyst I can think of that might spark a bull run towards that Ammount would be a bitcoin ETF. 
If you've been in Bitcoin for more than a year, you see it as better than 50% that we break the ATH this year.  I'd put it closer to 75%.
bump n grind - r kelly
Who's the prophet? Is it Chad69?
I'm 100x short. if you see a liquidation for 300 contracts that's me.
I'm clearly a minnow.
Always!
I wouldn't be so sure.
This sub has likely the highest density of multi\-millionaires of all reddit subs.

Most will trade with 1&#37; to max 10&#37; of their cold storage.

Whales used to play with 10k\+ coins in 2011\-2013

Now they play with 200\-500 coins.
lol... im not bragging. im just saying I pulled the trigger because I missed my train.

I dont trade with much. Nothing to get upset about... I would never open a 1M position, let alone 100k.

it was supposed to be a funny anecdote.

Also not my profit today... my profit in 5 mins

my cold storage makes me a big shot tho :) I’ve been in BTC since 2011... do the math
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Yeah that's absolutely true, but as of right now we're litterally up against the resistance. If we pop up another 50/100 and hold it for a bit I'll totally flip to bullish short-term as it would indicate clear reversal.

The faster pump than I expected makes me think we might double bottom at ~7900 or make a higher low in 8000-8100. I just think it's good r/r to wait out for a bit to see what happens.
lol if you will close at 8251 you are like 800x short
>are you being a sarcast?
Yes that's what you do, but other people think more logically.
I am cute. I'm also woke AF.

They are spending lots and lots of money in stupid quest to drive the price of Bitcoin down, and that makes my heart sing!
> My statements are usually based on consumer behavior rather than being based on TA.

Because consumer behavior is just as important as TA. And then TA itself is based on past trends, which are based on consumer behavior. 

We can't draw a line at say price X unless we know it has served as a support or resistance in the past. These support or resistance lines are the result of consumer behavior. 
I'm saying it's on life support because of that.  Otherwise we would have blasted right down through it IMO.
Indeed it is very strong. Not to forget, we stayed above it for quite a long time after returning from sub 8K, we reached here quite early which was surprising. I think there is something more to it. 

If you notice, the sells are being absorbed pretty nicely by the market.  
Good point about percent.  And 50 is indeed almost nothing.  I just meant > 0 really, to show that it's not signaling any sort of capitulation yet.

Also to note, it's shrinking now.  Before april BGD it was shrinking faster and was negative.

So the *rate of change* is probably the thing to look at.  It'll rapidly decrease leading to the local low zone, and continue to decrease there.

Anyway, it's a symptom of shorts eating that side of the orderbook alive, and buyers not being interested in filling the book up. (so it's kind of redundant with the other points, just easier to observe)
Yeah but that can happen anytime anyway.  Bitfinex could also get hacked again and drive the price down pretty fast, or a million other hypotheticals.

These "what ifs" are not useful.  The point is to observe what is actually happening, right now.

I'm trying to explain what an indicator would look like to try to bet on it.  Or if not bet on a BGD, at least guage what (non V spike) capitulation -> reversal looks like.

> weekend

Weekend is meaningless in my experience.

You know the battle has been lost when you have to say check back in 7 months.
Everyone in this sub is long term bullish. Everyone here believes that in 2\-3 years BTC will be much higher from what it is right now. We would not be invested in it in the first place.
Chad... you’re insulting me. 

I was rooting for you too... 

*sigh*
Reading your comments you sound mentally ill, no offense intended. 
Yes you are correct  Good point.
Rude
Ahh gotcha. I’m not too familiar with gradients. I was just speaking on more general terms. 
Yes that is pretty much it.  I'm hoping we don't get get tested like that, but it's rarely easy.
The chart says few people are getting "rekt" with shorts at the moment.
[removed]
I could just ban them and not tell them why.

Rule 1 and rule 4 warning for you, too.
[removed]
I mean it does not require too much price action to shake out 15m bands. It is enough of $50 up/down jump to shake them. I would expect seeing big moves if bbonds of a larger time \(1h, 4h, 1d\) frame are tight.
And pearl harbor.
Yes, to you. But on Bitfinex people regularly buy 1000+ BTC in one market buy.

Okex had a 38Million dollar limit buy at 6800 that stopped a dump in its tracks and the BGD was about 6 hours later
in 2017 Gdax took down a 1,250 coin sell wall at $17250. Twice. That's 5,000 coins at $8600 
That day was absolutely insane. And i was on the sidelines fml 
That's what the descending triangle would dictate. But ascending/descending triangles are usually continuation patterns, and this would be a reversal (off ATH)
i'm betting we'll see a 5 on this round of going down before going up to test $8,000 as the new resistance 
Yes I did, I didn’t know that was illegal here. Thank you for letting me know!
That's what I said. They're interested in your money. Right now best is fees. Tomorrow deposits. Day after interests from loans. Also, and this is pure conjecture, I think the entire low fees, cross-border, super fast, super secure transaction has more benefits to banks than to individuals...

Edit 1: I believe I read a Thomson Reuters article on the same. https://www.thomsonreuters.com/en/press-releases/2018/april/thomson-reuters-survey-finds-one-in-five-financial-institutions-considering-cryptocurrency-trading-in-2018.html

Edit 2: How could I forget Goldman
I'm one of many. Exchange volumes are rising. Localbitcoins rates and exchange rates are closest I've ever seen. Are you on that same Heroin you referred to? 
I get his point, my point is that things *have* changed. 
Just anecdotal evidence of course but nowadays, I pay for about 50&#37; of my Internet project\-related services \(design and stuff like that\) via btc, it's a LOT easier to find vendors/freelancers willing to accept btc than it has been a couple of years ago. 

I hire quite a few freelancers, so in my case at least, btc has tons of utility. Let's not even talk about the huge opportunity btc provides to those who live in countries PayPal et al don't do business with. It's not their friggin fault and now, with btc, I can hire them and nobody gives a fuck where they're from. Level playing field and all that.

I get that there's a long way to go adoption\-wise but please don't minimize btc's utility.
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtm18

* Opening value: 8,265.00

* Average value: 8,265.00

* Closing value: 8,360.00

* Leverage: 7.00X

* Stack: 25.00%

* PnL: -1.40%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I catched a really good entry, normally I do the same to trade a bit to lower my entry, but no time for that today. If we go lower now, I guess we will get here min 1 time again, that is where I would close. still hope this line holds as support now...

zoomed in: [https://imgur.com/a/OeoS5iv](https://imgur.com/a/OeoS5iv)
That's why I opened on the second tap, but yeah. There is some merit given the current market patterns to close as soon as you're in moderate profit off a Bart 
Because: trading fees, can't watch charts all day, and you can only get so many good entries within 48h or whatever. 
Not sure your opinion is overly valid, you've already admitted to being a degenerate gambler only a few hours ago.
Oh I thought I did that too. (connected first two peaks) lol
Still on Bitmex. A breakout above $8,400 could have made their platform unusable until $8,600. 

Wasn't worth giving up the entry at the time. 
i tink he's tryna catch the big move. he opened a long at the resistance downtrend line at like $6800 and that's how he got the BGD move
Thanks for the confirmation!
My bot is 2% away from unloading a shitcoin bag back into BTC that it's had for days.  Not looking like it'll happen.

I'm short, but just a few dozen dollars pump now would do me well...
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,230.00

* Average value: 8,230.00

* Closing value: 8,250.00

* Leverage: 15.00X

* Stack: 20.00%

* PnL: -0.01%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


[deleted]
Fair enough, but it remains a general misconception that a lot of people have about trading and I found this a good opportunity to clarify this misunderstanding.

> and not all survive it with enough capital to go to the next step

Another misconception. People always assume you need money to be able to learn trading, but you don't. Whether how much money you are making is irrelevant in the beginning. However it is relevant HOW you make it. It's all about consistency. That's the keyword, the ultimate goal. You are not aiming to make the biggest amount of money, but you are aiming to make money in the most consistent way. Somebody that has his equity going from 5k to 20k to 10k to 15k to 7k to 18k to 12k is a worse trader than someone who has his equity curve going from 100 usd to 200 to 400 to 300 to 500 to 600 to 500 to 600. You get the point, its about growing consistently, and it is very hard to achieve. You need to work and change your strategy in order to achieve this goal. Big trading firms that hire independent professional traders to manage big funds are not interested in how much money you are making, but they are interested in your equity curve (how). If it goes up consistently and exponentially for a few years then you're hired.

You're definitely right on the fact that each trader develops his own system. It depends on the personality, the style and the risk comfort level of the trader.

Don't see this as a direct answer to your post. I know that a lot of beginning traders read these forums (as did I) and when I have time on my hands I'm happy to respond to a few comments and share my view.

Happy trading :)
So what's your current position?
Bingo!
 Well no shit... obviously you didn't read my post properly.
Must be a strong believer in wealth redistribution.
So...he wanted to lose his money? Sounds like he has a gambling problem to me. Then again, I've met plenty of rich guys that blow money on a craps table for 6 hours and walk away light 20k having had a great time doing it.  I suppose it all depends on how much you value money over entertainment.
A delusional degenerate gambler, even better! 
that's not true, if he makes multiple trades and ends up having a bit more bitcoin even, he will actually lose money compared to holders due to taxes. saying that you outperformed holders by saying that you ended up with more bitcoin could actually mean a loss in money compared to holders. I think that's what a lot of traders seem to forget
Do you suppose that is more than half of them?  It's not.  Most very active traders lose money in both bull and bear markets.  Some even lose money faster than hodlers in bear markets.

Most people would be better off financially not to attempt trading.  Some people do very well trading.
i won the lottery so playing the lottery is a smart investement.

Obviusly this statement makes no sense, you need to think this in a statistically way.

 Do you honestly think if you take the average trader on a bull market and take into account taxes and fees that it will out perform holders? I'm not saying trading is a bad thing, i'm just trying to explain how the "hodling" is not actually an awful strategy for long term investors. We're in a trading sub so obviusly everyone has a litlle bias , and i'm here mainly for the smart discussions + i do trade but on much longer time frames usually once a month 
what if you bought at like...you know...not before 2017
Exploding....which direction. Haha
any time bro. This week I gotta do some studying but we could set up a call for next week
I see, buddy :) 
It's the carbs that get you mate, not the bacon.
it was obvious that it's sarcasm

we all have our opinions, but some of us can explain why they think that way and some can't/ some have a strategy and a plan to stick to and some just don't

the ones that can't are not in the best position over the long run; lack of a strategy (or not sticking to it) can bring very bad results over time, yet it might seem like "this is the way to go because i was right, and those traders were wrong"; it just works until it doesn't 

thats the reason you don't hear stories about people who are not good traders winning in that game over and over again; thats why you hear a lot of stories about pro traders winning big over time
This pastor just keeps going. 
[removed]
I was just kidding, I know what you meant.
but thats the problem, when it was just a bunch of nerds, you bought knowing that the dumb money was coming

nowadays, everyone is in crypto, and even with all that the price keeps falling. Where is the next round of dumb money coming from? 

you say all these people are loaded, if they continue buying why is the price still falling?

I'll tell you why. Bitcoin made a TON of millionaires. These people are now slowly moving a portion of their wealth to dollars, but there are so many of them that combined they are suppressing the price. If 10,000 holders sell 1 bitcoin a day regardless of what the price is just to pay for their spending habits, that's a lot of selling pressure. 
Dude... the coal plants overproduce energy. That enegy would get wasted otherwise. Why the fuck else would miners pay <1c per kWh?

Hydro plants do make up a lot of the power produced in rural regions 

Why would you build a coal plants that only operates efficiently when it reaches astronomical temperatures and have to transport fucktons of coal to rural areas all the time to cater to tiny amount of people. Why spend money on transistors and copper wiring the transport energy over vast distances?

that’s why a small hydro electric plant makes way more sense in rural locations
Not true. 

The entire reason why miners like Bitmain are able to get rates of under a couple cents per kWh for their facilities in Sichuan and Yunnan etc is because they struck deals with county-level hydroelectric power grids. 



Due to dumbass regulations, those hydropower stations couldn’t achieve the quota needed to be able to sell thru to the national electric grids, while at the same time the local demand wasn’t high enough. The surrounding areas end up using only a fraction of the privately-owned power companies’ output. 

/u/L14dy is absolutely right on this. 

You wouldn't if your interest were strictly financial.
I think we should address casino lights elec. consumption first.
It makes it valuable to anyone who has a dumpster and is willing to light it on fire in exchange for payment 
Sorry but I don't get the point!
The probability is really odd!
The thing is. Bitcoin is not here to make us all more equal. It is here to fix some systemic issues. It is an exit for rich dudes and poor dudes at the same time without creating another world war. It doesn't take away the riches from the rich, but it gives a lot to the poor guy (equal access to tools). 

Our current system doesn't like competition. The rich dude favours his monopoly over true (fair) competition and sportsmenship.

The fairest system we can create (as of where we stand as humanity) is based on competition. Which doesn't mean that cooperation is of vast value as well. The incentives make society work in the first place. If the game is rigged it'll put out bad results. 

Everybody will be able to trade the world markets and hedge his local production. 

Mining Bitcoin will become a commodity in a few years (we're almost there). That means everybody will have access to mining. That means you can compete from everywhere around the world as energy prices will converge around the world due to Bitcoin normalizing energy prices. 

Edit: PoS should rather be called Proof-of-State - because it lacks inherent dynamic. "Allowing" volatility makes complexity manageable. Hanging on to the status quo is anti-life and anti-progress. PoS is fiat empire 2.0.

There will be at least one PoW system we as humanity will operate.

POW is required to keep the system fair and give it the fairest start we can come up with. POS may work but its a little pointless in a blockchain at least with what bitcoin was trying to achieve. ASICs came around quickly before anybody really expected which made centralization much more possible but bitcoin is already sufficently decentral when it comes to mining by the time this happened.

The real beaty is that the threat of a possible POW change keeping miners incentivized to keep mining essentially fair. Markets were meant to take over mining they just wernt meant to have ultimate control of bitcoin. Its a genius bit of game theory that a lot of other projects dont seem to understand. Its also helped by the fact that satoshi is unknown so theres not even an avenue to influence there.

Interesting fact -Adam Back from blockstream was a pioneer in developing POW as an anti spam mechanism (another function of POW in the blockchain and a reason why blockspace cannot be free which is why we dont scale on chain) for use in email IIRC. His work has also helped contribute to the Tor browser.
One important difference is that PoW is permissionless, if you want to enter PoS later on you have to buy out an existing PoS miner. So with PoS you're always stuck with the same elite, while in PoW this could more easily change (still pretty hard and slow though).
Energy consumption means competition. Without competition you get a petrified society.

No need to be in Bitcoin if you favour the status quo. PoS is not much different than our current system. Waste is externalized. Energy waste is externalized.
POW is the cost of securing the network. What’s your point? Is POS better because it hands power over to the richest addresses?
Saving energy at the right places! Totally agree. Bitcoin can be produced wherever energy is abundant.

Edit: You are free to short Bitcoin until it vanishes from this planet. Markets are open to everybody and can be used for whatever you think is right. Put your money where your mouth is or STFU.
> without producing anything of value

like Christmas decorations? 
**mic drop**
We know that no companies are going to suddenly decide to accept it...no Amazon, no Paypal, no Microsoft.  Or at least the chances of that are very, very slim at this point.  So yes ETF is pretty much it, unless China decides to un-ban it, which is even less likely.
Wrong.  Most people who have been in Bitcoin for more than a year put it at 25.52%.
I prefer freddy vs Jason lol 
user10k
Do'h!
Krill here
Fair enough. I spend enough time on this sub to know who you are, so I suppose the joke is on me.
[removed]
IMHO we just broke the major downtrend resistance line since the almost 10k top. 
There's a reason I lost 90% of my stack in my first week trading ;)
Let me google that for you

[https://www.merriam\-webster.com/dictionary/sarcast](https://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/sarcast)
Thinking logically should weigh in such things in the right logical thought process.
I don't know man. For me the drop from 8,350 to 7,900 and recovering to 8,250 \(temporarily\) is pretty bearish. And yesterday pump was motivated by tether. I would say that buys are being absorbed now.We will see what happens next.
backwardation in futures happen because there is no way to margin the contract with USD. Otherwise it doesn't make sense (it is basically free money)
I don't "bet" on Ds in either direction.  I buy dips and never sell.  Works very well for me.  I'm down on exactly one buy (of many) at $9150, and I'm quite confident that one will turn green soon enough.  Looking to buy at $7500 now, hoping the bears have enough coins left to get it there.
Not everyone is a high-time preference borderline animal with no patience and discipline like you. Not everyone is so deranged to have to compulsively tickle the reward-system in their brain by betting on short term price movement(aka "random noise") like a degenerate gambler. Some people have enough impulse control to be ok with actually waiting for profits. 

You know you're talking  with a shit-tier animal closer to chimpanzees than homo sapiens when they act like waiting 7 months is a "loss".
That isn't true at all...not even close.  
Wait, what did I say to you?
Then you're in good company with me.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
[removed]
It's against their TOS for US citizens to use their exchange. Tread lightly
well if you are a person making those types of buys and where a $417K single buy is no biggie, bless you, that's amazing. Hope I get there someday soon too
The one that went down in like 3 to 5mn? I saw one live like this end of 2017, my jaws are still dropped from that day
Ah.. those were the days.
That was Dan Bilzerian’s sell walls (I like to think so)
At least you did not buy at the top as we were crushing thousand dollar ranges in an hour. But yeah, I watch the sped up version on YouTube from time to time. 
> and this would be a reversal (off ATH)

I'm sorry, what do you mean by that? isn't continuation = breakdown?
It's possible for whales to manipulate short time frames, but not large time frames :) Can't find a reason to go long here.
Lol I agree with his point but nice comeback Indiabro.
Ok if you and four of your friends (out of a nation of 1.3 billion) are buying BTC then that is proof that the ban is totally ineffective.

And your fantasies of the future aren't really relevant to the conversation about the reality of today.
Cryptocurrency use has been banned in quite a few countries so far (with more on the way), so that limits its utility tremendously.

If there was no draconian gov't regulations, Bitcoin and other crypto would be a home run.  But Bitcoin has been changed into something very different than it was in the past.  And what it is now and what it will further be changed into will fail.

I am not minimizes btc's utility, but nor am I exaggerating it.  
Love your charts man! Keep up the good work. 
I close immediately after a bart, whether green or red. I wait to make sure I dont get wicked, but after 5 minutes or so, I’m out. I get my coins or gift them to the next trader and Im happy.

too many times have I hodld through a complete bart formation and too many times have I switched positions from long to short or vice versa thinking a bart was imminent only to lose all my profits on the next leg.

If I catch a bart, close and got a cool off for 12 hours or the next bart, whichever comes first
No I admitted to winging it lately without having a clear strategy because my original strategy has left me holding the bag a few times. I admitted to being a gambler of sorts, but mostly because I trade on gut and instinct.

you called me a degenerate, constituting an ad hominem (or whatever that word is), which violates rule 1 for which I have reported you.

my opinion is valid (I think) because I try my best to be a constructive and productive member of this sub. 
Further down in the thread you can see his chart zoomed out.
Makes sense. Wouldn’t it hve been a good idea to open a futs short and set stops above 8420+premium?

Not trying to berate, just trying to understand
Pretty much. We all know a significant move is coming, but we don't know which direction. At least I don't. 

So I'm trying my best to hop into position when it looks like there's about to be a small breakout, with the assumption that it could turn into something larger. 
What happened in 1984?
Still short 
Not gonna deny that trading is essentially gambling. But even gamblers try to count cards.
Did you read mine? Losing is part of the game. It feels like you're not interested in learning anything and just feel like bashing traders at this point. 
He means that the phrase "I expected that" could have actually meant "I was prepared for that", as in they thought of the RR in advance and considered it a worthwhile bet.  Sometimes you know there is a higher probability that it'll go against your bet, but that if it goes with it the payoff will be significant.  (yeah it's just essentially gambling in the end)
I once saw someone lose 50k in Poker.

He then walked off to the roulette table and put 8k (must have been all he had left) on red. won and went home laughing.

It was quite a sight to behold 
More like a hall of famer who trades for fun. Gambler, sure, but I bought my trading stack for 25 bucks back in the day. Now it’s worth 49 grand... What’s your excuse 
If you make a profit, your profit is taxed and you still have some left.  Even 1 penny of net profit is better than the holders who all lose money in a bear market.
Did you ever think about that not everyone is American and has the same tax rules as you?
I have no idea what % of traders are profitable. It is probably less than 50%, but doesn't change one thing that I said.  Of course if you are a poor trader and lose money, then don't trade.

I do know that every profitable trader in a bear market outperforms 100% of holders in a bear market.


> Do you honestly think if you take the average trader on a bull market and take into account taxes and fees that it will out perform holders? 

I don’t know about an arbitrary/average trader, but I deff outperform hodlers in both markets, yes

HODLing is not an awful strategy at all! But the regulars in this sub deff outperform them

And don’t get me wrong: trading is not for everyone and just because you trade once a month does not make you any less of a trader than me!

We are equal, only have different strategies 
Holding is just trading in slow motion.  You try to find the bottom and buy a little bit.  Only diff is we never/seldom sell.  Personally, I don't plan to ever sell.  I think that in five years Bitcoin will be synonymous with money all over the world and that most people will prefer to be paid in Bitcoin.  Doesn't mean I don't watch the market.
If you bought at almost any point in 2017 you're still way up.  You'll be way up next year if you buy and hold now.  It's all about patience.  
I'm betting down

we had plenty of volume at $6,500....but in this price range its mostly selling minus the occasional pump to bring the price back up. 
Let me rephrase “ Ticking crock pot pressure cooker bomb “ aka extremely sketchy, no sense of direction, not a big explosion
Cool. I got windows on dual boot so I have skype so just let me know when your done studying.
is that an iPad on the podium?
thanks for having my back homie
Lol. Yeah, but there's not a 150 billion dollar market for that. Similar to bitcoin I think. Bitcoins usefulness is certainly not anywhere near what it's value is. Blockchain and crypto as a whole, yes. But bitcoin is failing. It will eventually be surpassed by more advanced blockchain technologies imo. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Not really, because of halvings.
Bullshit energy consumption just means concentration of power on those who can afford it exactly like proof of stake. It doesn't matter if the elite control the network wasting their millions on noisy machines or parking them on silent efficient staking wallets. You can't and won't ever be able to compete with Jihan or the mining tycoons that control the network exactly the same as you won't be able to compete with staking whales which is the same in any other industry of the current system you criticise. 
My point is that in an otherwise elegant design, spending electricity pointlessly is a flaw that needs to be fixed. 
What's your point? That bitcoin is also a made up concept headed by a well known, but never identified (possibly bearded) man, and thus should be relieved of any rules applicable to real, grownup stuff? Well, you might be just right. 
Completely agree. Those are it in my eyes as well. The money IS going to come, just a matter of being patient at this point. 
OK, well, let's see.

I say we don't have 400,000 stolen coins being unloaded on the market like in 2014-2015 so if you're looking for that kind of market, you'd better get a time machine.
No worries bro. I’m actually a nice person! You’re always welcome at my table ;) Just PM me
[removed]
Yeah and eth also just finished a good I H&S. Think we'll see a nice pump beyond the line. now I think the r/r is decent :)
You're right in your head, may be I am wrong in mine. lol. But I believe there must be a motive behind all this, Tethers, keeping the price stable and all.

The best answer, only time can tell really. :)
Honestly you lost me here.
Keep fantasizing and maybe you will have a different reality in 7 months or 7 years.   You certainly aren't doing well with dealing with the present day one.
I don’t do that man, I’m not insane.

I would never trade with more than 50 grand. I always say to myself:

Would you walk into a shop and buy a 50k watch or car? And the answer is “Fuck no”

Would you into a casino and put 50k on red/black? Fuck no

Hence I don’t trade with money I wouldnt be willing to blow on some dumb shit
I have two videos of 13k and 15k getting taken down... on the same day
Well, in my chart, the triangle is massive and goes all the way back to the ATH, so in that case, the price before the triangle was lower. 
I agree, this does seem possible.
K
Yeah but there's bound to be tremendous fluidity in those situations, kind of like China banning btc 10 times and then saying they'll publish a regular crypto report. My best guess is most of those bans will either be reversed or rendered irrelevant due to how hard it is to eforce them, once again China comes to mind with its (in)famous firewall.
I love you both
thanks mate =\)
now now gents
we don't need to call each other names like degenerate
nor point out rule breaking (which i'm guilty of right now ironically)

can't we all just get along?


Really though, if you've been trading for a while you'd be crazy to not consider the thought that you're gambling.  degenerate is not the same though.


I have 0 trust in their stops to execute. 

I've recently sat and watched them fail to execute right before my eyes. 

I'm working on getting out of there, but it's not an overnight transition. Have to evaluate other options for a few weeks. 
This is a very smart if you're a good trader and cognizant enough to do so effectively over such a long time frame. The issue is obviously timing your entries and exits to avoid small losses accumulating. You seem good at knowing when to get out around breakeven when I think most people are tempted to hang on to their positions longer. Most people have an issue with over-trading and one might think you do too based on your trading frequency and how quickly you close and flip sometimes but I don't think that's the case. I think you're just always setting yourself up for bigger moves and protecting capital as best you can, which is smart if you can handle the market 24/7. 
trading forex or stocks is not really gambling. There are plenty of strategies that have a proven track record. Look at how turtle trader performed in the 80s

Hell back in 2017 trading BTC wasnt gambling imo. Things made sense up until December

Now we have barts and bear markets that turn at the drop of a dime. RSIs in the 80s and 90s and it still goes up. RSIs in the 20s and it still goes down. Non-event news that causes a dump and pumps that just make no sense

It’s ridiculous 
the longer time frame you trade the less it's like gambling.

I mean it's never 100% gambling though. but day traders basically optimize risk/reward on a micro level to be profitable.. swing traders can actually trade trends and news
Learning? I've been trading for over 15 years my friend! I trade mostly options on indices and a few commodities.. I was just making an observation of this sub...
that's if you make 1 trade my man, but consider multiple trades, some you won some you lost, and your total bitcoin at the end was a bit above of what you had. In reality you'll have to pay taxes for every winning trade you made, resulting in you actually losing money when in fact you had more bitcoin
im talking for the most common country in this sub, where i live i actually don't even need to pay taxes on bitcoin
How do you know when a bear market begins and when it is over?  If you want to simply trade the bear markets and hodl through the bull markets to take advantage of your insight it's going to be pretty important to be able to correctly identify when you are in a bear market.

Is bitcoin in a bear market right now?
 Grats on your profits, i'll have to take your word for it , but the average trader most definetely loses more money than a holder on a bull market, the bear market is a different story.

What you're doing is taking an isolated occurance to justify your toughts, if you think in a pure statistical manner , holders will in fact out perform traders in a bull market.
if i didn't touch what I bought until now I'd quite literally be at breakeven right here 
I am a Cryptographer and Blockchain expert (some would say).

There is no more advanced technology out there right now...maybe on paper, but not in reality
If that's what make you happy, I am a gambler then.
Bitcoin mining chips are becoming a commodity. Maybe we're still 2 years away. Intel and Samsung entering the market means we're very close.

Mining rewards become less and less over time. Energy prices will converge around the world. Large scale Bitcoin mining is probably the bootstrap phase of Bitcoin. Let's talk in 25 years from now.

You're free to use the PoS 1.0 - fiat system or a future PoS 2.0 - crypto system. I don't care what you use.
But it’s not pointless if it’s the cost of protecting the network.
>  The money IS going to come

The money already came and went....and it's probably not coming back, in that quantity...not to BTC.
No we have something that is 10x worse...bans from Google, Twitter, Facebook, etc.  China and India banning Bitcoin along with many other countries and the EU and USA regulating it into something different than it was back then.
[removed]
if you were able to margin the futures with USD, you sell your bitcoins on spot and then go buy them on futures. Making you a bit of money. But you can only buy futures with bitcoins, so it doesn't work as well (the other option being to expose yourself to the risks of margin calls).
Haha, I’m with you on that, sound reasoning for sure. Best of luck out there.
The ultimate bitcoin says hold my beer day. So much fun. Working from home that day = stare at green people eating red people for 10 hours. 
> My best guess is most of those bans will either be reversed or rendered irrelevant

You can guess about the future all you want, but the reality of the present is that it is banned.
I can help you out if you wanna get on finex
Nope, it's not just for one trade.  This is a stupid discussion.  I am not going to debate the patently obvious.
This isn’t necessarily true.  “Profitable” trading in a bear market can also be seen as protecting fiat value through stop losses.  You set stop losses under major ranges and resistance.  When the major moves down occur you’re “losing” 2-5% (vs 15-20) in fiat value but, you’re trading stack remains.  I basically paid my taxes this year from technically losing trades.  This is obviously 1x trading as well.  
> How do you know when a bear market begins and when it is over? 

Is that a serious question?  You don't know with 100% certainty until some time afterwards.   

And then still there is confusion (especially in this sub) about what a bear market even is.

But all this doesn't change the fact that all profitable traders in bear markets outperform 100% of holders.  We had to listen to so many of the holders say how stupid trading was for the last couple of years.   It's not so stupid when you can make a profit, rather than losing 60% of your money.
I agree. For every winner, there has to be a loser and if you count fees, the entire traders market is forced to lose in expectstion. Add to it that profits are unbounded, while losses are bounded, the average and median are definitely on the losing end of the poop stick.

Statistically there is no contest. I completely agree
OK, so you're a newb. We've all been there.  Once you get through the initiation period (six months or so), you'll be quite pleased.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
lol you must be trolling at this point. Even if mining chips become as ubiquitous (they won't) as fucking shovels that doesn't mean you can go compete with the mining tycoons just like you won't be able to compete with De Beers extracting diamonds just because shovels are affordable at Home Depot.

Mining rewards being less and less actually increases the concentration of power around the elite that can continue mining efficiently using their datacenters with cheap power and their millions to cushion the price volatility unlike common folk.

The energy price of a datacentar of someone that can afford to buy in bulk several megawatts of geothermal energy in Iceland will never converge to the energy price of your suburban home for fucks sake.

Bitcoin mining was bootstrapped by CPUs then GPUs and now we are on the ASIC endgame where power is concentrated around a bunch of mining oligarchs like in any other industry except here we don't have antitrust laws to protect us. 
What makes you think so?

You realize that this has been said before... at $100, $250, $500, $1000 and so on.
An ETF can generate enough hype where there can be a second massive run of retail investors that ride a massive second wave. We’ll see what happens. Either scenario, still lots of money to be made. 
[removed]
Ah I see, thanks.
A lot of things are banned in let's say China at the moment of writing, doesn't mean people aren't finding ways around those bans.
What I'm trying to say is that when it comes to things like crypto, it's hard to put that genie back in the bottle. Eventually, you'll have no choice but to create a legal framework for it. Japan-style or whatever.
I appreciate that. I'm probably going to wind up using okex. 

They have the leverage I need to minimize risk. I still have a bad taste in my mouth with finex since the heck. 
where do you live? maybe your taxes work differently , don't be so quick to judge
It's not stupid because it is possible to make a profit?

How has a holder lost 60% of their money if they haven't sold?

Are you crushing it this year?

I'm seriously trying to understand what your point is.  Obviously some people do well trading.  Personally I have.  But honestly there is no question that most people lose money through very active trading, by a long shot.  Odds for profitability go up with swing trading.

100% of all Bitcoin hodlers holding for a year or more are in the green.  Yet many feel the real key is getting short at the right time.  Obviously you can make money if you get that right, but it's not super easy.  Often by the time everyone sees that it is a bear market, we aren't in a bear market going forward.  The low price for the year was February 5th, over three months ago, but people have been crying bear market the entire time since then.

Is bitcoin in a bear market right now?  

Do you think everyone should trade instead of invest?
it's been about 7 months now :p

I would not be pleased if I had held the whole time 
I don't know if its good or bad.
Hey isn't that what trading makes superior over discussing cast in stone opinions? You can short Bitcoin until it doesn't consume any more energy and I can long Bitcoin and other PoW cryptos until they consumes the whole planet (won't happen by the way). Long before that we'll find a middle ground/equilibrium.
Everything has been said before.  And in the past, BTC hadn't reached mainstream status with the media, etc.  Gov't regulation and bans will keep it from every becoming half as successful again.
[removed]
Yes 12 people are finding a way around the ban.  So I guess it's not an effective ban and has no impact on the crypto ecosystem or BTC market price.
Once again, more fantasies about the future where crypto cannot be denied and takes over the world.   That's great daydream fodder, but doesn't not much beyond that.
> How has a holder lost 60% of their money if they haven't sold?

20 -> 8 = -60%

> Do you think everyone should trade instead of invest?

Another absurd question. Yes that's what I was suggesting...way to follow along.


Sure. Like that hasn't been said before a million times.
[removed]
Everything has been said before.

Doesn't make it true or untrue.

What is true is what gov't regulation has done and is doing.  
[removed]
[removed]
Rule 1
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
